Came here for the first time EVER with a group of coworkers b/c one of them wanted to have a night of "drinking away our sorrows" d/t all the hustle, bustle, and pointless bullshit happening at work...lol...(at first, I was hesitant on going, only because peeps have said the food isn't all that, and the prices are ridiculous...but I'm glad I went): -Three of us got there a little before five; we told the hostess that we didn't have reservations, and that there would be a party of 8--luckily, we didn't have to wait for our entire party to arrive, and had  us seated right away. -While waiting for the rest of the group, we ordered stuff from the HH menu (HH is from 4-6pm): -For drinks I ordered the yuzu ginger mojito--don't entirely recall if that's the exact name for it, but it was yummy and refreshing--just what I needed after a long week of work...our waiter was nice enough to also give me a glass of iced water even though I hadn't asked for it...intuition maybe?...to fight off the buzz I'd shortly be getting from the mojito since I had nothing to eat yet lol... the other two coworkers on the other hand, who said they would "drink", ordered some kind of hot tea... -For food from the HH menu, we ordered: -the lettuce chicken wraps--omg, if I could, I would get like 10 orders of this, and have it all to myself lol--this came with three types of sauces--soy sauce,a spicy red chile sauce,and spicy mustard--I can do without all three of those... -edamame dumplings--not ordering this again--nothing special, it was just three puny little pieces with hardly any filling--minus 0.5 star haha... -spareribs with sauce--yummy in my tummy--meat was cooked just right, not hard to get off the bone--came with a side of pickled veggies--wasn't impressed with it cuz it didn't taste "pickly"...minus another 0.5 stars lol When the rest of the party came--what was supposed to be a night of drinking and eating dim sum...turned out to be a full-on dinner...smh lol...so here's what we ordered for all of us to share (fyi, not sure if it's like this for everyone and for other restaurants, but when HH was over, we told the guy we still wanted to get food from the HH menu--he said it was ok, and that we would still pay for HH price): -spareribs--they gave us 2 more plates--one with sauce and one without -another order of the delish lettuce chicken wraps -veggie dumplings-that I didn't bother trying -a plate of combo fried rice--good, but nothing memorable -stir-fried eggplant--i'm having another omg moment as I'm thinking about this delicious plate lol -honey walnut shrimp--now of all times that I've tried this dish...this one is different...but oh so yummy--it's fried coated shrimp in what looks like a sweet honey mustard sauce with candied walnuts and melon balls...odd, but it works... Ambience is nice, and staff were very attentive--thanks to our waiter for being so patient with us (unfortunately, I don't remember his name)--dealing with 8, tired, "angry", and hungry women :)
Absolutely terrible! I will never eat here again. After being seated, we waited and waited in the coldest restaurant on earth until I finally had to ask a random waiter walking by if he could call a server for us. Sweaty and frazzled he said he will take our order for us. I asked him about one of the salads on the menu and he had no clue what he was talking about, mentioning ingredients that weren't even in the salad. I decided to order items we have had in the past as a safe bet. The service was soooo slow. After waiting another 20 minutes we finally got our hot and sour soup which was FREEZING cold. We mentioned it to our waiter and the manager said she would bring out a new one. When the new one arrived, it was hot but looked congealed and jelly like. At this point, since we were all starving we went ahead and ate it. Eggrolls were soo oily and gross. They looked like they were old and were just refried to heat them up. Overall, everything was terrible. Service was incredibly slow and food didn't seem fresh. I will never step foot in a P.F. Changs again. Especially this one.
I did not enjoy my trip to this chain. The following may help if by some twist of fate you end up here: 1. Sit outside, the temperature inside was frigid. 2. Don't expect great service. The server/waitress combo was not with it. 3. Avoid the lemon chicken. Poor presentation, quality and taste. 4. They no longer offer Chow Fun, look elsewhere for it. 5. Do expect to pay $15 per person for lunch. If you are looking for better Chinese food, I'd recommend Hunan Garden: http://www.yelp.com/biz/...
Recently, I treated my family to dinner at PF Chang's. We have always enjoyed reliably good food here. I am writing to commend the wonderful service provided by Rick Colunga, the Manager of the restaurant that evening. The place was busy and the staff was busily attending to a good crowd and this caused a delay in having our order placed. Rick immediately jumped in and expertly introduced us to the menu and thoughtfully made suggestions that recognized a shellfish allergy of my mother-in-law. We were made to feel very special and we look forward to returning soon!
Food was as good as you would expect at any PF Chang's restaurant. Service was nice and we were able to get seated pretty quickly even though it seemed pretty busy. The waitress was really good about taking care of the kids first and overall I had a positive experience at this location. I would definitely go back again.
Went there for the first time last night. Had a reservation and asked to sit outside upon arriving. Without even asking if we had a reservation, we were told tables weren't available - even though there were four empty tables outside. Okay, in we go. It was extremely cold inside of this restaurant .  We sat for quite a while before a waiter came to table. Okay, let that go. Ordered drinks which came without garnishes. What's a gin and tonic without a lime?  Asked for limes, which didn't arrive for quite a while. Ordered appetizers. When they arrived the server dropped them off of the plate onto the try, picked them up with his fingers and put them back on the plate and served them to us. whoa. Entrees were pretty skimpy portions. Another waiter came by and dropped a tray of dirty plates. What is going on with this place?  Quite a show!  No sauces served with our entrees. Had to ask for them. At the end of our dinner water was served. Better late than never.  Without clearing the table of the dirty dishes our waiter brought the check. No mention of dessert or coffee. Needless to say, I will not be returning.
Haikus for PF Chang's (Stanford Shopping Center)..... Going-away fete For our buddy from Texas PF Chang's (Stanford)! A party of ten We showed up at 8pm Seated by 8:10! Our waiter was kind Must say, he had his hands full But he served us well! All the food impressed From crab fried rice to green beans To kung pao chicken! We shared ten entrees I enjoyed everything Not one exception! They served ginger beer A fave at Caribbean spots Now PF Chang's? Score! Desserts were splendid: Banana Spring Rolls, Great Wall Various shots too! It reminded me Why PFC ranked so high On my list, years past!
Is that licorice I'm tasting? That was the question posed to me by my not-so-pleased dining companion... Read more 
Once upon a time PF Changs was one of our favorite places. This was about ten years ago before it was a franchise. The food was cooked to order, fresh and the signature sauce was in a bigger bowl. Fast forward to 2012. I still order the same dishes (except they no longer have the Lemon Pepper Shrimp, BIG mistake since it was the best item) but they do not have the same outcome. The food is still good just not great like the old days. My family agrees that the portions are smaller which confuses us since its served family style. Its either overcooked or over sauced now. I think our days at PF's are done but I will always remember the great memories we had. The service is still great though!
P.F. Stands for Pretty Flavorless and pretty friggin' dirty. I'm not onpbly dirty bathrooms and hand smears on doors and glass walls throughout the restaurant  The food was dry, uninspired and I hate to see mediocrity get rewarded. The shopping center visitors deserve better. I'm happy to eat at California pizza kitchen, it's also a chain but they use fresh ingredients and the food has great tastes and it's clean. the Peninsula Creamery, a few doors away, has delicious food and caters to parties and families...but it's clean with well-prepared entrees and deserts. At pd changs, nothing was done with care. I was afraid to use the bathroom!!!! When they first opened, I tried it and was very disappointed and vowed I wouldnt come back again. Second time is the charm.
I really liked the sesame chicken and (surprisingly) the strawberry lemonade. The waitstaff that I've had here have all been very nice, and the food comes out pretty quickly.
This is one of our kids' favorite place to go - 'cos of the mini desserts - so we swing by here maybe once a month.....however, this last week (8/2) the service was the worst we've ever experienced. Our server was disengaged, slow and forgot things multiple times - it took 45mins to get our dinner - and most tables on our side were totally frustrated. Wondering if they've lowered their service bar or cut back on training for servers - whatever it is, might have to convince our kids to try a different place! (PS:  food itself was so so -  nothing special)
This is a pretty late review since I went here around February (?). Butttt, I'd say the food it mediocre. My friend and I were hungry and we saw that this was 'chinese' food. Maybe it's just me, but it was a little too Americanized for me. Everything didn't seem to taste right. Too much salt. Funny thing I pointed out to my friend: There were absolutely no asian people inside the restaurant when we went except for us two. haha! I thought the service was good tho. However...I found plastic in one of the wonton shrimps we ordered. Like a huge huge piece of plastic that was extremely sharp. My friend and I pretty much left unsatisfied. I did feel bad for one of the waiters though. While we were there a bunch of plates fell in the kitchen and broke.
Food is dismal here.  Wasn't dressed for Flemings, so had to dine here. Only thing reasonable: Chicken lettuce wraps, Salt & pepper calamari. The cocktails were even dismal. Chinese 88 Martini was sour beyond belief, Asian Pear Mojito wasn't shaken long enough. Yes, the decor is nice. Americanized Chinese food is almost insulted by this. If you want real chinese food, try Taipan on Waverly.  Koi Palace in Daly City remains the best around here. If you want hipster cutting edge Americanized chinese, goto Mission Chinese in San Francisco.
I give this place a 3.5 stars an extra half star for their customer service. We had the $39.95 Pre-fix menu and it was more than enough for two that we had to doggie bag home the remainders. The pepper beef was ok but not all that, but the orange peel shrimp was really good. I wouldn't recommend the spring rolls aka deep fried egg rolls, they weren't wrapped tightly that the vegetables was loosely trapped with some oil. Greasy I should say. The outdoor patio is nice, but left some dust on our settings but the server was nice enough to switch that out for us.
Wow, what an experience coming to this location. I am giving 2 stars because of Oscar our Server and the Manager on duty Mandy. Well it all started when we sat down and I opened my silverware it was wet stinky and dirty it had left over food stuck on them! Which was gross! I ordered an appetizer and a side of Spicy green beans along with the rest of my entrees. I got the green beans My chicken wraps never made it to the table but we were charged for them so I pointed out to our server. We waited for a long time for the food and I can understand its a Friday night. Anyways when the food finally came out it was a huge disappointment! the worse dish was the Garlic noodles horrible at it's best!! They were over cooked and sticky and they look like they were sitting there under the heat,  they were disgusting. The rest of the 2 entrees were whatever and that's all I will say about that. Our server Oscar was on break when we were seated perhaps that's why this happened who knows. Mandy was very sorry for our bad experience! And took good care of us and kept apologizing for the poor quality food we got! I will not come back to this Pf chang's location.
Happy hour review only: Love that their happy hour starts so early, M-F 3-6.  Frequent this place with my fellow colleagues, our usuals include: Cocktails: -Organic Agave Margarita - margarita?  at a chinese restaurant?  how good can it be?  was my whole thought process, but decided to try it for $6 at happy hour.  boy was i glad, shaken with a salt rim i was in margarita heaven, so smooth and good. -Yuzu Ginger Mojito - refreshing to the core!  nice on a hot summer day. Wines: -Kendall Jackson Chardonnay - they have it by the glass at happy hour, our usual unless it's a special occassion in which case we splurge for bottle of Rombauer -Rombauer Chardonnay - while not on the happy hour discount list PF Chang's is one of the few restaurants that carry this delicious buttery chardonnay. Dim Sum: -Chang's Chicken Lettuce Wraps - can't go wrong with this dish, love that the bartender makes the special "PF Chang sauce" right in front of us - get the sauce extra spicy! -Crispy Green Beans - delish when it comes out piping hot.  comes with a special sauce that we haven't quite figured out, looks like cheese but tastes like spicy butter. -Asian Street Tacos - aahhh, the beef street taco is to die for.  happy hour dish comes with 2 tacos, the marinated beef is so tender and carries just the right amount of spice. -Norther Style Spare Ribs - 4 braised ribs that they rub a salt crust on, oh so good. Overall:  great early happy hour spot, prices are reasonable and food is decent.  bartenders are always friendly.
Came in for early dinner with 2 hungry kids. Restaurant was relatively empty. We were seated promptly. And waited...and waited. No water. Menus closed, ready to order. Several servers standing around, others clearing and setting tables for dinner. And yet..we continued to wait. Went up to the hostess to say...hey, we're waiting for service...and she looked like a deer in the headlights. And yet...we still waited. And then - we left. The server that then did come as we were heading to the door looked surprised. I bet he had no idea that we were waiting since it was change of shift.  Obviously not well organized or run. I've rarely ever left a restaurant like that. Had a great dinner at Palo Alto Creamery with amazing service in the mall. That was awesome.
My HORRIBLE CUSTOMER SERVICE experience at PF CHANG'S in Palo Alto last night... The place was about 25% capacity. I started noticing the tables close by (who were seated after us) were getting their food so... after 30 minutes of waiting... I flagged my server to ask about our dishes. Then we only received 2 of the 4 ordered. As we started eating, I flagged him again asking about the other 2... THE SERVER HAD FORGOTTEN! He had to ask what they were then he simply said, "Oh!" with a hand in the air gesture then ran to the kitchen. He did not make any apology, nor did any staff check up on us. I finally flagged him one last time for the check & I left VERY DISSATISFIED! :-( This Place was the WORST RESTAURANT SERVICE EXPERIENCE EVER!!!
Although I typically like this place, this is the first time at the Palo Alto location. The service was terrible. I really wanted to decrease the automatic gratuity but decided to just suck it up. So what went wrong: - The service was extremely slow - Beer did not arrive until after 15+ minutes (we wanted to go to the bar ourselves to get it) - Our table didn't have enough room for all the food - Table was filled with plates so we tried to empty some of them out to allow us to have more room, but it didn't matter because our waitress never came by to take away any plates or check up on us. Our plates were taken away when I told the waitress to take away our plates (when we were all done with dinner!) - Some of the food was cold (probably bc we ordered tons of food) Food was pretty good: Sea Bass - Good Mongolian Beef - tough and a bit cold Pepper Steak - ok Garlic noodles - just ok, noodles tasted like plastic Honey Chicken - pretty tasty Green Beans - Good Crispy Honey Shrimp - Ok Ma Po Tofu - Good Beer - Excellent when it finally arrived You should sign up for the PF Chang's Warrior Card to receive discounts (although as of last year they used to give 10% off, this time I received a free lettuce wrap)
Count me in as a fan of PF Chang's, and have been for the last 10 years or so ever since I first discovered them while on a business trip to Dallas.  My go-to dish - the Mongolian beef, tasty steak with a huge, healthy serving of super fresh green onions.  However other dishes that I tried are good too like the pork fried rice and the garlic noodles (ask them to add shrimp). Chicken lettuce wraps are my other go to dish, though they seem to be better when you eat in than for take out (last two times for take out they didn't add the crispy noodles... unless they changed it).  It's also better eating in as they will custom make the sauce for you, depending on how hot (or not) you want it. Pricey... yeah, a bit especially considering I remember the Mongolian beef dish for being around $10-12, and now its pushing $16. Bartenders here also serve one of the most liberal pours of liquor I've seen, and still offer it for under 10 bucks.  Maker's on the rocks, yes please!! Usually when I do take out I'll just order at the bar but the last time, I called my order in - the guy said my order would be ready in a hour (!).  However when I showed up to the bar it seemed like they tried rushing my order to me so I didn't have to wait so long.  Almost seems like its faster to just show up and order there rather than call in. This location is also one of the funkiest (and not very well planned out) layouts I've seen in a PF Changs.  When they built it, they put the front door on the side facing El Camino Real - away from the parking lot.  So now the actual front door, that used to be the back, is facing the parking lot and the "front" door is now the back... which means the bar is way in the back as well.  Just odd. FYI, they are doing some sort of promotion to celebrate the Year of the Dragon.  They give you a red envelope with a special inside, only them can open it on your next visit.  Could be a free appetizer or a dessert, or a coupon - I got 20% off my bill.
Pros: +   Great service +   Convenient parking Cons: -   Awful food -   Unduly expensive
I used to come here often whenever I was around Stanford Mall. Their mapo tofu is pretty good but definitely not the traditional dish if that's what you're looking for. Their orange peel chicken or mandarin chicken is also tasty. If you come to their happy hour it is definitely worth it. The crispy green beans with their house sauce is very delicious. Other items also good to try is the lettuce wrap, crab wontons, steamed dumplings, and Chang's spareribs. The only thing you probably would have to watch out for is their inconsistency between their lunch and happy hour/dinner chefs. If you come at lunch the food sometimes will be extra salty and oily, hence the three star rating. Otherwise it would be a great place to eat.
The food was hugely disappointing. The service was pretentious, but they treated us well. The ambiance was the best part of the meal. SUM: We ended up eating lunch again at home
It used to be a favorite for lunch, but the service seems to have become very slow. The food isn't bad, but when my favorite dish (beef, water chestnuts, etc) was taken off the menu, I've kind of lost interest. I still like some of the offerings (steamed dumplings, chicken lettuce wraps, lo mein), but since I can't eat shellfish, the menu seems somewhat limited for me. I adore the chocolate shot dessert. We mainly still go here for our gluten-free lunchtime friend. We miss the bartender Ryan.
We always have great service when we visit this Pf Changs, the one by our house is not very good, crazy why not, but true! The food is always served hot and fresh and it is a great place to go when you have kids with you!
You more or less know what it's like here, Americanized Asian Food, labeled authentic or fusion. But nevertheless it's still good when that's what you're looking for. Check in on Yelp to get a free dim sum/appetizer item from their pretty expansive happy hour menu. (lettuce wraps excluded).
I had to kill time before a class one evening and decided to go to PF Chang's for their Happy Hour menu!! I don't normally go to PF Chang's because I personally feel it's a bit too pricey for chinese food and I prefer a more authentic chinese cuisine than the americanized chinese food. I ordered: - lemon grass dumpling: the skin was smooth but I couldn't find "meat" (supposed to filled with chicken, but where was it??!!" The lemon grass was very mild and almost non existence. - dumpling with sticky rice and pork topped with sriracha sauce - It was "different" and quiet spicy..not bad - Ahi tuna on a wonton crisp: my favorite of the night!!! Generous portion of chopped grilled tuna , bold flavor, delicious!!! - Combination Fried Rice: it was good but I've certainly had better fried rice for half the price!! (it was $10.95, quiet pricey!) I accompanied the dinner with a glass of pinot grigio ..not bad for $5 (happy hour price). Service was friendly but a bit slow.. The restaurant is elegantly decorated...and it was pretty romantic (dark lighting). It was funny to see a table with 4 elderly asked for a flash light so that they could read the menu :) If you are looking to impress your date (and if your date likes chinese food) or even for a business dinner/lunch.. PF Chang's is a good place. But if you're looking for a great chinese food..you should look elsewhere and you will easily find those half the price with better tasting food.
I ordered food from their takeout service and it the experience was interesting. I arrived 10 minutes after they said my food was going to be ready.  I stood at the takeout place for about 5 minutes and had servers walk past me quite a bit.  Finally, someone dressed differently (I think it was their manager?) was in the kitchen.  I poked my head in and he asked me if I was being helped, I said no.  He quickly said let me find you someone.  I didn't think swiping my card and giving me my food was hard work but I guess it was too much for him.  FINALLY someone showed up and asked me for my name.  He looked up my order and said it wasn't there but he would go look for it in the kitchen.  He came back with my food, handed it to me, and I walked away.  This entire experience of picking up food took about 20 minutes when I had ordered it 40 minutes prior to picking up. I walk to my office about 5-10 minutes away, sat down, and dug in.  The food was COLD.  Possibly even colder than the salad. This place is hit and miss with the service.  Sometimes they're great and days like today they are horrible.  I think I'm done trying to get this good days.
We had a delightful and delicious meal last Thursday.  When I got home I discovered I was missing my diamond cross.  After checking the bedroom area very thoroughly I thought I would just give PF Chang a call and see if they found it.  Yes, they had and it was in the manager's office.  High marks for a staff that is so honest.
Came here after a Stanford football game, so the place was packed. The Wonton Soup and Lettuce Wraps were great, but everything else was a bit greasy. Service was downright poor - the waiter rarely came back to our table. However, I left really disappointed that they failed to honor their Yelp offer. I checked in here because there was a limited time offer for one free dim-sum or street fare item if you checked in on Yelp. I showed it to my waiter and he was completely unaware of the offer. Ten minutes later, he came back and said the offer is only good during happy hour. However, the offer did not state that anywhere! So basically I got tricked into checking in for nothing.
I really did not like their food, it was the kind that makes you wish you hadn't eaten it. Simple as that.
We went last Sunday and the food was good as usual but great reason to go here is the wait staff. We were served by Chase and he was excellent always checking up and making sure everything was fine. All employees that we have interacted with are great.
We normally go here for brunch on Sunday's. The food has always been good as well as the service.... Read more 
The only reason why PF Chang's is getting 3 stars is because of the food and atmosphere; pretty good food and nice atmosphere! I came here with my family at around lunch time during the weekend. The hostess asked us if we had a reservation and after telling them that we had a party of 7, we were prepared to look for another place. Luckily, we were seated within 5 minutes and our waiter suggested his favorite items off the menu. Every item we ordered off the menu was good, but the one item that stood out were their lettuce wraps! Good Lord, those are amazing! Why not the 5 stars? Welp, the service was slow, we had to ask for our drinks to get refilled, and it took FOREVER to get our check.
As a http://modernworkinggirl... , I enjoy "pseudo" Chinese food....however, it was just not that good... I give 1 star for the ambience, although they had to put a carpet at the entry (I think to cover some cracked floor) with blue duck tape. I went there during lunch time and ordered sesame chicken. It came with hot and sour soup and the soup was black color and was super thick. I was drinking sauce, not soup...plus it was super salty. As for the chicken, they loaded up with tons of sauce over the rice and I could hardly eat it. It's too bad because I really want to love this place.
Ok, I don't know if there are new chefs, or worse chefs during the day, but twice we've gone in for a late lunch and 1) my noodles were undercooked 2) a strip of plastic was in my noodle dish 3) my sauce was way too watery 4) my friends rice dish was bland, tasteless. All a major yuk experience, except for the waiter who was great, attentive, apologetic. I sent a message to the restaurant manager and no reply! Not wasting time or money here!
Pretty much the essence of a 3 star place.  Service was awful.  Very slow.  My waiter asked me and my friend if we were on our summer break.  I gave him a quizzical look and told him I'm 23 and own a business.  I feel like if you're going to try and strike up a conversation with a patron, don't assume they're highschool students.  For reference, my dining companian is my coworker, also not a HS student. Food was pretty good.  Nothing to really write home about, but it was solid.  Had the vegetarian lettuce wraps and the double pan friend noodles.  I enjoyed the food.  I'm probably not going back here though; I really don't like it when people assume Im 17...
Poor Service. Mediocre, Overpriced Food. I am writing this review after THREE horrific experiences. Food -- Decent, but nothing to rave about -- Overpriced for the entree size and flavor (avg price is $12-15) -- Sometimes undercooked. Sometimes overcooked and soggy (especially the Dan Dan noodles). -- This isn't real Asian food, but then again no one expected it to be. I expected more from a restaurant in the Stanford Shopping Center. Poor Service -- We had 4-5 waiters during the course of our dinner. Each politely told us they were going on break and handed us off without telling the new server anything ... this happened on all three of our visits... -- Waiters were pretty incompetent. We specifically asked our waiter to bring the soup and appetizers first and to bring the entrees about 20 minutes later....I think this is a pretty normal request.... Even so, everything arrived at the same time.  .... this also happened on all three of our visits ... --Waiters yelled to other waiters from our table. They also yelled from our table to the kitchen over a room divider. -- Employees bumped into my head as they swept/mopped the floor behind me. Ambience --This PF Chang's is like a big dining hall decorated in the PF Chang's color scheme. Because it's a large hall, it's SO loud. I could barely hear my family across the table. --Go to the Sunnyvale PF Chang's if you're addicted to this chain. The floor plan is at least more functional. Conclusion: I'm not sure why people frequent this PF Chang's. It's not cheap enough to be "that Chinese place" you go when you want to go out (or order in from). The food quality and service is not good enough to merit going here for a nice meal (or to celebrate anything, let alone with guests).
Terrible food.  Mongolian beef was tough and chewy, moo goo gai pan was icky,  the only thing decent was the spicy string beans with a bowl of steamed rice.  Food came out lukewarm.  Panda express does a way better job than these guys.  The service was fine and attentive at my most recent visit but past visits have been spotty and slow service.  I won't be coming back however because the food seems to be getting worse.
Sigh.  When a friend of mine wanted to come here, I had never tried this place, and decided to give it a shot.  On a friday night. 30+ Minute wait to be seated, when the restaurant wasn't quite full. 10+ Minute wait to have a server find us and get a drink order after we were seated. Staff were not at all attentive.  In fact, despite repeated attempts to make eye contact with *anyone* nobody seemed to catch it, including the two managers who were running around with earpieces on. The appetizer I got was a seared tuna special.  The whole point of seared tuna is to cook it minimally to preserve the basic flavor it has.  Chang's (note this is a Japanese dish at a Chinese [themed] restaurant) was overcrusted in their rub, and then drowned in sauce. The orange beef I got came out overcooked and mostly flavorless, lumped together on a plate with no garnish or anything else. Another 20+ minute wait to get our check and get out of there. PS, overpriced.  Not worth the price of admission. Corporate food at its worst.  We should have just gone to someplace authentic like Jing Jing in downtown PA.
My fiance loves Chinese food and I absolutely hate it, but once in awhile I give in and  have it with him to be nice.   We came here for dinner tonight (first visit to a PF Changs for both of us, believe it or not) and surprisingly I really liked it!  Probably because it is completely inauthentic Chinese (almost bordering on Asian fusion, which I generally like much more). Our dinner got off to a bad start when we arrived at 6:20 and found out that they didn't have any record of our 6:30 reservation.  Fortunately they were able to get us seated by around 6:40.  We were starving, but fortunately the food came out really fast once we were able to get our waiter's attention to order.   I had the chicken lettuce wraps ($8), which is an appetizer but was plenty filling.  My fiance had the honey chicken ($14).    I understand that the lettuce wraps are their signature thing, and they were so good!   It was nicely season chicken, sauteed in oil (a little heavy on the oil but so yummy) and mixed with some veg and rice sticks, served with big pieces of lettuce to make wraps with.   I devoured it.  So I know this isn't exactly real Chinese food, but I finally had something in a Chinese restaurant that I actually really liked!  I would be happy to come back here & eat this again.  My fiance liked his chicken pretty well, but we both thought the portion was awfully small for an entree.   I think I actually got more food with the lettuce wraps.    I also had a flourless chocolate dome ($6) for dessert which was incredibly rich, and surprisingly REALLY good, especially for a restaurant not known for its desserts. Despite the good food, I'm still not crazy about the restaurant.  The atmosphere is very loud and the service was poor, except from the kitchen, which prepared the food very fast.  But the waiter was impossible to get ahold of and very slow about water refills and bringing the bill.   I also think its quite pricey for what it is.   Our meal was about $35 with tax and tip - and I had an appetizer as my main meal.    Nonetheless, I would gladly go back here for the lettuce wraps.  My fiance is so, so happy that we've found a "Chinese" restaurant I will actually go to willingly!
Awesome food if you get the flavorful items and reasonable prices- awesome for groups and parties! The service is pretty slow and crappy, they mess stuff up and bump into your chair ALL THE TIME, i have also had a waiter spill a drink on me which was not desireable.
As long as you aren't in a hurry, the food is great, the wait staff is very well trained and made great recommendations, and the food was outstanding. If things had been a little speedier we would have given four stars. Two hours start to finish.
Worst Chinese food ever. Don't even think of eating here. Yuck. There is so much GOOD Chinese food in the Bay Area no need to eat at this mall inspired wasteland.
Really good food.  Really slow service, especially if you are seated outside.  We have waited 45 minutes after ordering before getting our food on more than one occasion.
I never even noticed there was a PF Chang at this location. It is hidden from the rest of the mall. Anyways, we were seated under the vents spewing cold air and politely asked to be moved, our waiter obliged, but made an annoyed face. She took our water and tea order and didn't return for about 10 minutes. I looked around to other patrons, and another group of men moved from the table originally under the vents too. And most patrons in our area still had their jackets on -- Weird!! My aunt and mom were still cold, and asked if the heat could be turned up. Our Waitress said she would speak to the manager about it. Then she took our order and disappeared for 20 minutes. She didn't, nor did anyone else make the "special" sauce for us. After 15 minutes went by, we stopped a bus boy and asked where our appetizers were. Of course he didn't know, but he said he would go find out.  We received our appetizers, but still never saw our waiter. We waited another 15-20 minutes since the appetizers were served for the rest of our order. My aunt was still cold, so she went to the manager to ask for the heat to be turned up. When my aunt returned she had an annoyed expression, she said that the manager never got the request from the waiter. Immediately we felt the warm air. Another server came by to give our dinner, and honestly I would have preferred him to our waiter. He was polite and prompt with our request for dinner plates. He brought the rest of our food and our waiter was still no where to be seen. Finally she, the waiter, came by and asked how our meal was, and before we could answer, she left! We finally saw her again, when it was time to pack our food in boxes and order dessert. Before she started packing, I ordered out dessert. However, I thought her way of doing things was a little backwards. She packed the food, ordered our dessert (or least that is what she said, that she was going to do), and then removed the completed dinner plates. When she served our dessert, I immediately requested the check which she bought over quickly. Over 1.5 hours at PF Changes for 3 people: 1 pot of white tea 1 Veg. Lettuce Wraps 1 Coconut Curried Veggies 1 Spicy Green Beans 1 Orange peel shrimp 3 bowls of rice (even though we ordered 2) 1 Banana spring roll dessert The food was decent as expected, lost some quality compared to 5 years ago.. I don't recommend coming here under any circumstance unless you like overpriced crap service.
OMFG. Lettuce wraps. Salmon rolls. Custom sauces that the waiter makes RIGHT THEN AND THERE. GET. IN. MY. BELLY. I went here for a celebratory dinner a couple months ago, and despite it being somewhat marred with stressful calls during the meal, the food  made me forget all about it. We had an excellent waiter. Although it is not an upscale restaurant, this establishments made up for it in its nice decor and cleanliness. It's a perfect place to grab a bite to eat after a few hours shopping in the Stanford Mall, and there is ample parking space.
Never envisioned Chinese food to be so high-end in price. It was more of a mixture of sorts. their appetizers are great but I don't care much for their main dishes.
Fast food with style - not that it is "fast food". If you want nice food Cal Fusion Style Asian in a dressy atmosphere - they serve it up efficiently and fast once you are seated. Sometimes there is a line at high tide at the weekend dinner. My husband loves getting lemon shrimp and the chocolate deserts. I love stealing his shrimp.  I usually end up with budda's feast because of food sensitivities. Mojito's are pretty good. Nice teas. Lettuce wraps are great. Too bad the Veg Curry has corn starch - I have to ask "why why why?" Wade the manager there is a stellar guy - who we will try to say hello to when we are there. He is a man of great ethics.
Food wasn't too bad. We ordered the prix fixe meal which came with soup, appetizer, 2 entrees, rice, and dessert for $40. I will warn you now, I was starving by the time we sat down to eat, so my reviews of the food might be biased. When starving, everything tastes great! For soup, I had the hot and sour soup. It was really good, thicker than other hot and sour soups. Interestingly, I think it had chunks of chicken! I've never had chicken in hot and sour soup before. For the appetizer, we ordered the chicken lettuce wraps. Since I was starving I thought they were great! We ordered mongolian beef and sesame chicken for the entrees. The beef had good flavor, however the meat had quite a bit of fat. The chicken also had good flavor but less fat. I would order these entrees again. For dessert, we got to choose from an assortment of little shot glasses filled with different types of desserts. I remember chocolate cake, tiramisu, and red velvet cake being among the options. We choose the red velvet and tiramisu. The presentation was cute, but the taste wasn't great. I've had much better tiramisu and red velvet cake elsewhere. Minus 2 stars for overall service. We got to the restaurant pretty early, around 5:30, and were told the wait would be about 10-15 min. It took 30 min. Once seated, service was pretty slow too. As we were finishing up our meal, I noticed that a family was just getting seated nearby. This family had been waiting while we had been waiting. Their wait must have been about an hour. I overheard the waitstaff say that the family was upset, too, since they were quoted 30 min. So, don't trust the hostess' seating time, you might need to double it. Minus .5 stars for the rice. Probably the worst white rice I've ever had at a Chinese restaurant. How could they get it wrong??
I give them 3 stars, yet I keep coming back. The food is really really ok. Not great, but good. They have this sweet offer right now. PF Chang's dinner for two $40. Soup I always go hot and sour b/c I love it so much, but unlike at real Chinese destinations, I find myself flavoring the soup with hot chili paste and soy sauce. One App I love the chicken lettuce wraps. 2 entrees Mongolian Beef and Kung Pao Shrimp are really really ok. Dessert I skipped b/c I chowed so hard on my real food.
Their gluten free menu is huge! I rarely get to eat Chinese food so even being able to eat asian-ish food was awesome. The gluten free lettuce wraps and fried rice was so good.
Ate in the bar, but it was fine. The tables were pretty sticky We ordered appetizers and drinks, but the food all came out at once The best deals by far are the veggie sides ($2.95).  Had the asparagus and the green beans. Wait staff five stars.  They are all seasoned pros.
This place deserves 4 stars for its soups.  But since I am writing a review for the entire restaurant, I would give it 3 stars.  The sesame chicken was OK.  I like their honey walnut shrimp and beef dishes.  If you're craving Asian fusion, this is definitely the place to be!  And don't forget to order their soups!
The short version: 1.5 stars for the food, +1.5 stars for convenience and ampleness of parking (compared to Sunnyvale location for example) and its location, as well as decent service and vibe. It's a place where I'd only go (and did so) on someone else's dime. The long version: For someone who prefers their Asian on the hardcore side (I meant food, not NC-17 and triple X action/dramedy flicks thanks you), the menu reads like Dante's Inferno where you could be damned with either choice you make. So many choices, so many of them crappy, so little time. If you don't mind spicy, the Sichuan By The Sea selection (aka spicy shrimp and/or scallops) is a somewhat safe one but only if you don't mind the freakin sweet and sour bullshizzle that is tossed in it. I would have been perfectly content if they stir fried it in XO sauce, or just used a lot of COCK sauce (Srriracha) or that garlic chili paste that is ubiquitous with Pho restaurants all over. But nooooooooooooo they had to combine all the fusiony flavors in one. No sorry, please keep sweet and sour pork or whatever SEPARATE. Don't sweet n' sour a spicy dish, that is SO WRONG. While I like contrasting flavors and textures, this is so not one (or many) of them.... F**K! Iron Chef Chen Kenichi don't do that shizzle with his signature Sichuan style Chili Prawns, and neither did his dad. I also figured it out. PF stands for Pfffffffffffffffffffffffffffffffffffffffffft. I let you figure out if that came from a brain or somewhere else.
For two years running we have met on Xmas eve with some coworkers to dine here. The wait staff for us was great and the ambiance nice.  Although I could see how it could get loud in there if it was crowded. While I have never been overly impressed with the food, and yes it does remind me of a chili's or Denny's as some others said on Yelp. This year I ordered  Orange peel chicken,  I can honestly say it was difficult to eat.  I have never seen chicken dryer in my life, I kept looking at it and thinking (is this really chicken?). The orange sauce was non existent. The appetizer I had was the seared Ahi Tuna.  It was OK...not Sushi grade for sure. I took most of it home as leftovers, maybe when I am really hungry I can try again.
Went back for the first time in five years in December for a dinner with co-workers.  I know it's not real Chinese food, yet it's not really fusion either.  PF Chang's = Pretty Fake Chang's?  Food was pretty flavorless.  Small portions but still pricey.  And they used tortillas for mushu pork!  Nuff said? Service from our waiter was attentive though, so one star for you Mr. Waiter!
Do you like your food to glow in the dark? Do you like shrimp to shine like it's blingier than your gf's tiffany bracelet? Do you like food like Honey Walnut Shrimp that costs 15-20 dollars but is equal to or lesser than the restaurants a couple miles away that serve Honey Walnut Shrimp and cost 5-10? Do you like to pay 10 dollars extra per plate so you can be in steakhouse furnishings, get buzzers as you wait, and have guys named Brad, and girls name Ashley come seat you, and have american made asian warrior statues as your amenities so you feel SAFE and SECURE? Do you like to feel you are eating "EXOTIC" food from the ORIENT..but are really just downing sweet/sour sauce made of ketchup, vinegar, and sugar?   Do you like to down this stuff w/your egg roll and broccoli beef as though it's moonshine back in the south? Do you think it's "not that bad" cuz it seems to taste a lot like denny's..so you don't see what the point is? Do you not care about authentic unless it's for preztels? (OMG..that was too funny) Do you think it's funny that people make fun of PF CHangs but you seem to like it? Sometimes it's not good to laugh WITH people..it's good to laugh AT them....or was it the other way around?  I think my first grade teacher who told me that cliche ate at PF changs too! Oh..well..guess that moonshine sweet/sour glow in the dark special sauce is seeping up to my brain! Well my FRIIIEND.....P.F CHANGs is the PLACE FOR YOU!!!! COME ONE COME ALL! p.s.  And all your SUPPORTERS of PF Changs... it's not the FOOD persay that people are "complaining" about..it's that YOU are full of shit for liking this stuff. So instead of racial profiling "authentic" chinese food as hole in the walls w/mystery meat... Try to find humor in yourselves eating the very same mystery meat you think DOESN'T get served at PF Changs doused w/ketchup and vinegar and sugar and charges you 100% more than it really is worth.. You think PF Chang and Rocky Aoki from Benihana weren't sitting there w/their business plans going..."hey..let's give them some sweet/sour food to make them feel like they're actually doing something" Thanks for making PF and Rocky rich to their eyeballs w/your muted taste buds and lack of taste...
I was not expecting much coming in, I've been to the one in Emeryville, and chains usually turn me off, still it's not a very high two on my rating scale.  The other thing that often worries me is that if I sit down in a place known for it's ethnic cuisine and I take a brief look around the restaurant and notice people of that ethnic cuisine are not eating here, it usually gives me a deep feeling of dread as to the meal I'm about to have.  Leaving that aside, I felt our server did try her best, but I think we came on a busy night, and she would disappear quite frequently for long periods of time.My biggest issue with this place is that they pride themselves on an upscale Chinese dinning experience and this is where it has it's biggest faults. This is an observation that my little brother made who was eating here with me, the orangy yellow lighting makes for a dim atmosphere, so dim I cannot even get a good look at the food.  He was right, the plates for the most part may have looked pretty under normal light, but under these yellow orange disks hanging above us the plats looked like the food was tones of grays, browns, dark greens and blacks.  I have always been it needs to be about the taste, looks is nice, but it needs to taste good. I did think that the lemon scallops and minced chicken and eggplant were the only two dishes that I felt were very tasty, the flavors were there and it was perfectly cooked, which was a nice surprise, compared to the bland wok chard beef and Dan Dan Noodles which was the server's recommendation.  You can tell that they use the same exact sauce for both dishes, the beef dish was surprisingly bland and the Dan Dan noodles were overcooked and the sauce was the same oyster sauce bland flavoring seen in the wok chard beef... Dessert wise the chocolate wall wasn't anything special, just a chocolate cake with a chocolate frosting in between, they could have done so much more by adding a mouse layer, fruit fillings, or a crisp tart like layer, something to add some sort of change of flavor or texture.  The fried banana was actually pretty good, the vanilla ice cream had a much more intense vanilla flavor, I am glad the coconut and pineapple wasn't in it like the menu said, banana and vanilla bean works just fine, otherwise I think it would have been to much... Again it's about the atmosphere and a place to go with friends, can get very loud.  In all honesty, I would prefer to just eat at a cheap, authentic Chinese place with gaudy decorations and good clean honest flavors any day of the week.
I'd give the place a 3.5 but I figure 4 is ok too. The food is pretty good.  The staff is pretty friendly and the decor is nice to look at. Drawbacks:  SLOW SERVICE  I mean not just  a little lagging slow service but I mean from the time I sat down to the time I was able to leave was a 2 hour ordeal. We sat down, ordered our stuff and the first dish arrived 20 minutes later (appetizer).  We waited another 20 minutes for our main courses to arrive.  We were done eating and waited around patiently to get the check (and I do mean patiently) I'd say bout 40 minutes rolled by as we waited for the check.  We paid cash but needed change and we waited another 15 to 20 minutes to get it. My guess is that they were a bit understaffed.  The waitress was very pleasant and I felt bad that she was running around.
Growing up my mother insisted that I not only liked pineapple upside down cake but that I really loved it. Our conversations went something like that. Mom "here, I made this for you, have some" me "no, I don't like it" Mom "but you love it!" me "no, I don't want any" Well you get the point. For years I told most everyone I know (and don't know) that I hated PF Chang. It was "fake Chinese" "chainy" and one step above Cup O Noodles. Trust be told, I never gave it a fair chance and it had been years since I had last tried it. Last night we gave it a shot. I have to admit, it was actually pretty good. The pot stickers weren't the best ever, but then again I chowed down on them just fine. The chicken dishes seemed to be fresh and the veggies crisp and tasty. I still wont admit in public that I liked my meal here and no one will ever read this review. Right?
Somewhat embarrassed to be reviewing this place, but it least it won't take long :p I acquiesced into going here, so my first disclaimer was I didn't pick it. On rare occasion for business travel I will eat at one of these. Reasons why in my opinion you would come here, when you live in the food mecca called the Bay Area: - you are on business with a lot of different, non discerning people (like my sales teams) who want to eat a fair quantity of food and not break your budget - your meal is greatly discounted and/or free - your palette just happens to prefer  massive quantities of food, prepared the exact same way all over the country for thousands more. (yes, in case you don't travel PF Changs is a massive national chain.) In their defense, in a world of a lot of very meh, so so, cheaply prepared Chinese food, its not bad. Some of their locations actually have decent bars, active social scene, and often very long waits. (watch out for the herd - mooooooo) This one had a so-so decor, and I thought the food was also less on par than one I ate at last fall in Raleigh. Take your hard earned food dollars, and go support someone local. Studies show a much greater financial impact when you support a locally owned venue, not a monster corporation...
Every single time I've eaten here I have had a sick feeling in my stomach afterwards: - Their rice sucks so bad. I mean they didn't even KNOW what sticky rice was. I asked them for sticky rice and the waitress was "like, what is that, never heard of that my dear". Is this an Asian resturant or not?? Their rice tasted like Uncle Bens instant rice.. no .. worse than that! - Their food is way too oily and salty. It was definitely frozen and you can tell. The sauce is obviously covering up something. Gross. - Full of college kids. The ambiance is beautiful but the crowd is annoying. You'll hear a birthday party and a bunch of kids no matter what. Kinda like the TGIF crowd. - They don't have plates just for 1 person with a little bit of everything. They assume you're with other people and are sharing. - Our waiter this time around (yes, I've been multiple times like an idiot) was so clueless he told us that GREEN TEA had the same amount of caffeine in it as coffee! I tried arguing with him but he just said "no, I'm so sure, it's the exact same" LOL Look at this website of caffeine (mg) per 8oz serving: http://www.wilstar.com/c... Tea, green  15 Coffee, Drip  115-175 Oh, and their "Green Tea" is just one of those teabags in water. It isn't even the authentic tea leaves! I'm just so annoyed.. this place represents what is wrong with everything on this planet.
This is a review by a vegetarian I don't care if it's "authentic" (except if we're talking about soft pretzels from Philadelphia) or a chain or 'hip' or whatever. I got sick after eating here at this one. End of story. Have never gone back to any of them.
This is a great P.F. Chang's.  Be sure to eat here if you're shopping at  Stanford Shopping Center.
It's a Chain, but It's no Slouch: Over the past year, I have dined at both the Mountain View and Palo Alto PF Chang's on several occasions. The dining room in Palo Alto is more pleasant, but the kitchen in Sunnyvale is better. The wine list is okay -- they have David Bruce Pinot, and J Pinot Gris. Palo Alto offers Sonoma Cutrer, but Sunnyvale does not. These few selections are enough to redeem the rest of the wine list. Mixed drinks look good, but I rarely drink them. It is notable, though, that they carry licor 43 for the key lime pie martini; they are probably the best in town. The decor in these restaurants is red chinese lantern with warm colors and dark wood, coupled with plaster of paris Ming Dynasty life size horses. The colors are relaxing. Service? Sometimes impeccable, and sometimes not, but never anything causing ire, so long as you understand that this restaurant is not McDonald's, and it is a busy place. Last night when I asked for coconut rice, the chef made two different coconut sauces for me, as it is not carried on the menu. Some items are spectacular. The sea bass is consistently good, as are the seared ahi appetizer, and crab wontons. The sea bass is buttery, with a light and sweet soy sauce over a bed of spinach. The Seared Ahi? It is presented with pea shoots, and a sauce that makes the dish. One of my favorite dishes, the szechuan green beans, turned out overfried and soggy yesterday. We weren't going to say anything, but when asked, we were given a free voucher for another appetizer. The garlic snap peas are good, but REALLY garlicky. Honey prawns? Avoid them. This restaurant chain has several great dishes -- they are batting about 70% with me. Supposedly the mongolian beef is their signature dish, but I prefer the sea bass. Dan dan noodles are absolutely delicious, but heavy. Singapore street noodles are good, and the chow mein, although greasy, is as good as any chow mein I've tasted. Oh, and avoid the appetizer that is called Singapore street balls or something to that effect. They are little pork baseballs that lack the great flavors of the other dishes. Also, everyone orders the lettuce wraps. Get over that one; they are ok, but the Szechuan Prawns are excellent. So, the service is better in Sunnyvale. In Palo Alto, I actually had a server call me, "Hey, baby." I asked how his day was going, and he said, "We were swamped earlier, it was just hell, but it's better now." Indeed he kept on going with a review of the day's restaurant work. The bathrooms are well appointed with long Asian sinks and marble. It would have been great if there had been soap in the dispenser last night. Oh, and it's a Chinese restaurant. The smells will leave themselves in your clothes. Make a reservation, and be patient for the wait. I can't believe how overloaded this restaurant is on Tuesday. There is always the bar, which might actually be one of the best seats in the house. I know it's a chain, but I really like PF Chang's. They do a consistently good job with many things, and they sponsor a marathon. Actually, they sponsor several marathons. Good job. (Note that I rated the food as "good" because I am comparing to, say, Gary Danko's and Bouchon. Reviews to come on those two.)
Yummy food, good atmosphere, and great location.   Annoying service. I had been eating at PF Changs for years in So Cal and somehow did not realize that it was in fact a chain restaurant.   So this is of my recent experience there in PA. This is not authentic Chinese food.  I am ok with that.   The lettuce wraps (chicken or tofu)  are a must!   The dessert shots are super good, especially the red velvet cake one.  The decent food was overshadowed by our server. The service was good and efficient, but one huge gripe.   I came here to have a nice quiet dinner with my boyfriend.  Not a chatty dinner with my boyfriend and our waitress.   I know some people need to be babied by their servers, but all I need is for them to do their job well and let me eat in peace.  Every 2 seconds she was at our table, chatty chatty chatty.  She was super nice, but I didn't want to have her analysis of what we ate and didn't, and I certainly did not want to hear her complain about the other servers bringing our food too quickly or too slowly.   I feel like great service is something that should be almost unseen, it should just happen.  Fancy place or not fancy place.  It shouldn't feel invasive and  like someone is hovering.  Am I being petty?  Maybe.  The service  was...tacky.
Mmmm....I don't think so.  I tried this place a while back, so possibly things have changed and they are actually pretty decent now.  But from what I've read, probably not. My friend and I always wondered how authentic PF Chang's was, so we decided to stop in to see for ourselves.  We weren't ridiculously hungry, so we decided to split two staples - Kung Pay Chicken and Broccoli Beef.  We didn't set our expectations too high, but I have to say, we were still disappointed for a place that seems so popular.  The Broccoli Beef is inherently nothing special, but this one really lacked a distinct taste.  The Kung Pao was comparatively better, but probably because it consists of more ingredients to give it flavor.  Still, it failed to make any notes of significance for me. The service was fine...the waiter was helpful and he did recommend a decent glass of cabernet sauvignon at my request.  Obviously, PFC is pretty much a glorified Panda Express, but even more Americanized and more expensive.  Given that, no reason to come back when I can get the same at Panda in the malls.
I know it's probably more hip to say that I didn't like my meal at PF Changs, but Reza and I had a great time.  Sure, it wasn't very authenic, it was pricey and somewhat overblown, but hey, it's a "China Bistro"... if you aren't into mixing your cultures, stay away! Our waiter was cute and chatty without being intrusive and had refills for our sodas before they hit bottom. What more can you want? We had a late lunch, early dinner, arriving at 5:30 without reservations and were seated immediately.  We ordered crab crispy won tons and the salt/pepper calamari, both of which were tasty, even if the dipping sauces were pretty much one-trick ponies.  For entrees, we each ate half of our garlic chicken eggplant and citron salmon, so that we could share a slice of chocolate cake. The coffee that we ordered with the cake was drinkable, but not over the top.  Everything was tasty.  I didn't expect authentic Chinese cuisine, because this is a national chain, where all the food is slanted toward the middle end of American taste buds. All together, it was a pleasant celebratory lunch/dinner, surrounded by other happy people.  What's not to like?
I don't like the idea of chain restaurants, especially a Chinese one here in the Bay Area, but I've come to really enjoy PF Chang's. On this particular occasion, it was late and we needed something to fill us before heading back to SF. Nothing was open beyond the standard fast food options. We ducked into the Chang at about 10:30, and were seated immediately. We had some of those lettuce wraps (who doesn't love those) and the waiter made the sauce nice and spicy. I know, I know, I'm a sucker, but I drove home satisfied.
Ran into Larry Page here a few weeks back. My thought was, "Dude, you can afford the best private chef that money can buy. Better yet, you can take personal classes from Chef Ramsey, and cook your own bombalicious meals. With a limited number of meals in life, why would you come here?" Then I remembered dessert. So if your into banana desserts, get the fried bananas with coconut ice cream. Aside from galaktobeureko at Evvia, or Havana Bananas at La Bodeguita, it is one of the most delectable sweet concoctions known to man. More than 5 stars. As for the rest of this place: 1. The Wait: Call ahead. The wait is stinking abysmal. Even if you have a reservation, you'll end up waiting outside for a while. Negative stars. 2. The Duck. Every time I come here, someone insists on ordering the peking duck. It's always overcooked. Negative stars. 3. The Drinks. Actually, pretty good. 3 stars. 4. The Double -fried noodles. Very good. 4 stars. 5. The Appetizers. OK. 3 stars. 6. The Prices. Surprisingly good for the haute atmosphere. 4 stars. 7. The Service. Always friendly and accomodating by me. 4 stars.
So what if it's a chain, and what if the food isn't authentic Chinese? As picky as I am with my Chinese food, as much as I dislike eating in strip malls, and as much as I don't really enjoy restaurant chains (however fancy they may be), I think P.F. Chang's really isn't that bad. The decor is chic but a little over the top (replicas of the terracotta warriors all over the place, big paintings on the walls etc). The waiters are white and polite, the cooks are Mexican, and the line is way too long for a Chinese restaurant... hey, they even give out buzzers thingies while you're waiting in line. The food nonetheless is relatively tasty: some Americanized version of Chinese classics, but not bad. The best dish I've had there so far: the Mongolian beef. Now let me mention that I never ever order beef at restaurants, and hardly ever eat it. So my friends are always shocked when I order the Mongolian beef there, but I just can't resist: it is delicious! The lettuce cups are also not bad, and so is the orange chicken. I was a little surprised and disappointed when they substituted water chestnuts for the walnuts in our honey walnut shrimp dish just because one of us was allergic to peanuts (I mean... honeyed walnuts and water chestnuts don't really compare). Anyways, I wouldn't go every day, and it's also obviously a little pricier than your average Chinese, but hey, I've never really had a bad experience there (except for the time I lost my credit card, but I went back the next day and the manager had found it).
I typically go to the PF Changs in Downtown SJ.  I love love love the veggie lettuce wraps. My friend and I were in Palo Alto and decided to go out to eat in the Stanford Shopping Center.  The food was as usual very good. The service needed some improvement.  The main waiter barely said anything and mumbled his words.  He didn't mix the hot sauce for us and we did not see him once the food was out.  Luckily, there was a near by waiter that got us more water and helped us with the hot sauce.  We made sure the second waiter got our tip.
If you order the right dishes, you will have a yummy meal. I don't know about the authenticity, but when the food is delicious, why does it matter which cuisine it fits into? I met PF's family last weekend and his mother says her favorite is the smoked ribs and the seared ahi tuna. His sister recommended the garlic noodles.
I like PF Changs.  I do.  I know it's not "authentic" Chinese food, but it's pretty darn tasty. What I don't like is being seated next to a table with a little girl that does nothing but make high pitched noises all throughout dinner and her parents doing nothing about it.  All they did was raise their voices to talk over her.  Ummm, ok. I don't like the interior of this one as much as I do Sunnyvale, but the food was on par.  Great gluten-free menu, but don't be so stingy with the soy sauce next time!  The chicken lettuce wraps, singapore noodles and changs spicy chicken all rocked.  YUM!  But, come on ... is the Beef a la Sichuan really the spiciest beef dish on the menu?  I certainly hope not because it didn't taste spicy to either of us at all! Tighten up, PF Changs. If you're going to make a claim like that you better live up to it!
our whole entire office ate here and the best thing about this is that we ordered one plate of EVERYTHING on the menu!!!!!!! I would rather go to an authentic Chinese restaurant for quality of course but for a large group of 16 people this place was really fun.......and we all shared the enormous slice of chocolate cake -3 stars because I prefer authentic:) +1 star because they have brown rice
Food was good, our server was knowledgeable and friendly and we had a great time! Crab wontons, Chang's Chicken and spicy green beans are so delicious! And they give you complimentary steamed rice! I also loved the decor and lively atmosphere!
This location is at the corner of one of the huge parking lots at the Stanford Shopping Center, but you may still have trouble finding a close space.  Last time I went, we were a party of 16 and we had to wait more than a half hour after our reservation to be seated.  The manager comped us all of our appetizers, which was really nice. In general, P.F. Chang's often has a long wait, but I find it worth it for some of the best fried dumplings anywhere.  The spring rolls are not so great, so skip them, but sampling most anything else should prove tasty.  They offer a good selection of vegetarian dishes, filling salads, and several other entrees that would get dubbed "California Chinese".  They'll make you a dipping sauce at your table, as spicy as you want it, and the decor is fun.  Also, I love any place that has sake on the menu.
I met this lady that said, "PF Chang's is like two Jewish boys who decided to open up a restaurant." Then she reinforced with, "It's Chinese food for White Americans." My reaction to that was...*NODDS* I know I shouldn't write racial stuff online, but to be honest...I was absolutely shocked to hear a white American lady say that. But she's from NY and she's blunt as heck. When she said that, I felt like I can undo my jeans and let my gut hang. I feel like I have to hold back and display manners at all times. There are times where I can or cannot say things. But when she said it...I felt good to hear that. It's something I've agreed with in the back of my head and I found it to be awesome to hear a white american say that. So, I'm not the one that is saying that. I'm just sharing you guys what another person said. If you want the Authentic stuff, you need to attend the places where it's loud and obnoxious service. That's authentic Chinese...from the food to the service to the ghettoness. It's overpriced Chinese food. It may not be authentic, but I have to say, for non-authentic, it's damn good. I just wouldn't pay the price for it. Try the beef chowfun...not bad. It's pretty damn good. I have cravings for it once in a while. All PF Changs are the same.
I used to be the first person to hate on inauthentic Chinese food, but I've decided that Chinese-American food actually tastes pretty good.. sorry :(.   The downside here is that even though the waiters aren't rude, the service is definitely slow, so I wouldn't recommend this place if you're trying to grab a bite in between shopping. If you have time to spare, though, you should go for dinner and try the dan dan noodles. One of my girlfriends introduced it to me two years ago, and it's the only thing I ever get now. It's spicy, filling, and delicious! Plus it encompass three food groups (it has veggies, protein, and carbs), so you don't need to order anything else. If you're not convinced about the noodles, here are some other suggestions: For appetizer, I like the crab wontons. The northwestern-style spare ribs are also not bad. For main course, I suggest avoiding the hunan pork because it's disgrace to my family's heritage. I like the wok-seared lamb and Chang's spicy chicken. Of course, you can't really go wrong with Mongolian beef. Not all of the dishes here are amazing, but the restaurant is overall solid if you don't take authenticity too seriously. I recommend coming back more than once and finding the foods that work for you. If you know what to order, you're bound to have yourself large portions of tasty Americanized Chinese food...  yeahhh
Before I continue, just need to make something clear. This review is not of the chain of PF Changs. This is only for Palo Alto. We came in mid afternoon while it was pretty dead. Was asked to still wait for 5 minutes prior to seating us. After waiting at our table for another 10 minutes, the waiter finally made an appearance. He acted more annoyed than hospitable. We ordered Wine for my husband and Mojito for me. I asked him to make sure I get extra mint and lime. When we got the drinks, my husband had beer and my Mojito was mint free and lemons in a dish on the side. As my husband didn't make a big deal and decided to drink the beer, I was very upset since I was really craving a good Mojito my way. When I asked him to bring me what I wanted the way I want it, he rolled his eyes and stormed away. We ordered the typical things we order when at PF Changs (lettuce wraps, garlic noodles, scallops in oyster sauce and dessert) The food came and it was so bland that I felt that I was eating hospital food. I have been to at least 10 and none of them were this awful. So I am still waiting for my Mojito.... Since the food was so bad, we couldn't eat it and they brought us small shots of desserts (overly sweet). As we're about to ask for the check, my Mojito comes. I didn't know whether to laugh or throw a bitch fit. As we were walking out, I decided to go to the restroom. There were paper towels, toilet covers and toilet paper all over the floor . The sinks were dirty full of things I can't even explain. Some of the toilets were not flushed. It was so disgusting that I decided to use the restroom in the mall. I love other PF Changs and will continue to go to them but this one, NEVER!!!
I decided to give this place a try, since a friend enjoys their food, plus I drive by it every day. I got carry out.  Even acknowledging that it is an asian-american style restaurant...  Bad.  Pure and simple.  I suspect that the fortune cookies are the best thing on their menu, and they are exactly like other chinese restaurant fortune cookies. Drive a few more miles and go someplace that has menu items that actually taste like food.
When I want to dine on authentic Chinese food, I'll go to a restaurant that has real Chinese chefs who don't follow a "written recipe"     The server coming to the table to mix a personalized dish of sauces for me doesn't impress me. If you want pseudo - Americanized Chinese food, PF Changs is the place to go. Does anyone know what the "PF" stands for?
I love love love PF Chang's, and have had good experiences at the Palo Alto location before.  Usually, I would give them 5 stars, but this weekend was just not very good. There were a couple reasons this trip wasn't as good as usual: 1) We sat in the bar area, because we didn't feel like waiting for a table in the main seating area 2) It was 6pm on a Friday, so it was pretty crowded 3) We ordered from the fixed price 2-person meal.  Not sure it was a good deal... The fixed price menu included 2 soups, 1 starter, 2 main dishes, and 2 mini-desserts.  The only soup choices were egg drop and hot & sour.  We got one each.  I would not have ordered soup if the meal didn't come with one, and they were not impressive.  But then again, how good can egg drop soup be? We ordered the crispy green beans as the starter, because I love love love green beans.  When they came out, I was surprised the green beans were deep-fried.  This was probably my fault though, because I didn't ask, and anyway, the sauce was good and my date really liked the deep-fried-ness. For main dishes, we got the sichuan beef and the cantonese shrimp.  Both duds.  The beef is super-spicy, which wouldn't have been so bad if we got water refills efficiently.  Since we were right next to the bar, I just took my glass and asked a bartender to fill it up for me.  The beef was also over-charred, dry, and tough.  The cantonese shrimp was bland, which I should have understood from the "healthy" description.  Still, it should have come with some kind of sauce to add flavor.  I added soy sauce, but in the end it was just okay.  The snow peas that came with the shrimp were overcooked. The mini-desserts were good, but they were mini (served in glorified shot glasses).  We got the cheesecake and the s'more (I thought the s'more was a bit too sweet). Service, though, wasn't very good.  This may have been because we were seated in the bar area, and it looked like our waitress had all the tables in the bar area.  She was slow to take orders, bring drinks, refill drinks, and that was all she did.  The other waitstaff (servers) were very friendly, and food came out from the kitchen quickly. All in all, I'll try to avoid PF Chang's on the weekends and stick to the weekdays.
Americanized chinese food...I know, but I have a love affair with the Pf Changs in San Jose. What did I know? -Extremely small portions of salt and pepper calamari, heavy on the batter, tiny toothpick looking pieces of calamari. -Dried out Kung pow chicken with no spice or pow whatsoever. -Funky tasting overcooked crab wontons. -Flavorless pieces of prawns with walnuts drenched in weird tasting sauce and mushy honeydew. The spicy green beens was delicious. The irony is that the were the cheapest thing of them all. Three bucks and ninty five cents, I believe. If you want Pf changs, go to San ho.
Okay, I realize this is not authentic asian food. But I suppose they don't pretend to be either. I love that they have a full bar. My favorite is their Pear Mojito! It's a great place to meet friends because of the family style dining. Another plus is that you can call ahead to put your name on the list so you don't have to wait so long when you get there. There is usually a wait on the weekends. They really should revisit their pricing. $40-$50 for two people - for oily chain restaurant food? If I'm in the area already, fine. But I wouldn't go out of my way to come here.
"How bad could it be?" For Chinese people, going to PF Chang's is kind of a tongue-in-cheek experiment. We know our dishes will be bastardized, and know full well that we are going in to eat an alien cuisine that has zero relation to Chinese food.  But hey, maybe it could be good in its own way. No. Do not get tricked by this hope. No no no no no. You could not pay me to go back to this place. I would not wish the leftovers of this place on a homeless person or child in Africa. No amount of social pressure "But it's my birthday and I want my birthday dinner to be at PF Chang's" will convince me to eat here again. If you have chosen to have your birthday dinner at PF Chang's and won't forgive me for not coming to celebrate with you, then consider our relationship severed.  That includes you, Mom.
Most PF Chang's provide a good dinner experience. Whether it was the Xmas rush or the uncaring college staff, this visit was a bummer. Extremely slow and very unfriendly staff. Even the hot and sour soup was extremely salty. Stay away on weekend dinners.
3.5 stars - I'll bump it up to 4 just because the food has always been good (even though its a chain), and their happy hour is pretty good too. If you've never tried PFs, you should; pretty much everything on their menu is tasty. You really can't go wrong - its upscale "chinese" food, we're talking about here! I also love that they have happy hour, and that its not the exact same hours as Flemming's happy hour.  If you're feeling adventurous, you can come here for an appetizer and a drink (HR ends at 6), then head over to Flemmings and do it again (ends at 7).  JK....no, but seriously, thats actually not a bad idea... hint hint XX martini is YUMM , as are the lettuce wraps
I don't understand why they have people wait when half the tables are empty. Waitstaff is questionable, but food is consistent and always pretty good. My favorite americanized chinese food.
I love this place!! Its a little pricey but it is really hard to find g free Chinese food that is this good and the service makes up for the price. I ordered the pork fried rice, beef and broccoli, shrimp in lobster sause and egg drop soup. They have seperate plates for all g free food and even take that sauses that aren't g free off your table so you don't get confused. Food was great and so was the service!!!!!!
I appreciate the gesture, but never give a gift card to PF Chang's to an Asian - it's kind of insulting. If I want Chinese, I go to a Chinese restaurant, not a faux Chinese with "Bistro" in its name. This is horrible because I don't like writing negative things about places - this could be a wonderful dining experience and really special if they just pay attention to how Chinese food should really taste and just not try to pass...it's not that hard. My friend and I went with low expectations and they met them. First, the Chinese motif makes it seem special, but the country music and the non-Asian servers and the fact that it was Chinese New Year and there was no acknowledgement of it in sight was a precursor to the food. We already know their soups are pretty bad, so we didn't order any. Something is amiss when it's all about the presentation down to the explanation of the condiments on the table. The lettuce wraps and crab won ton were average. The spareribs were tasty. The ahi tuna appetizer was OK but nothing to write home about.  So the appetizers were passable. Fried rice was really salty. But do not order the lamb - it was over salted and gamy tasting - we had to return it because not only was it inedible, the taste of sodium stayed on my tongue for the next couple of hours.  Someone needs to go to a Mediterranean restaurant to see how lamb is done right. It was a total waste; we returned it and the server took it off the tab. My favorite thing was the fried bananas but it did nothing to satiate my appetite. Seriously? I was still hungry and we were still sitting at the table. Nothing is worse than leaving a Chinese restaurant and being hungry. What I did enjoy was their iced tea which had free refills and we gave our server a nice big tip because he put up with our cynicism. He was really sincere and had great customer service...even if he wasn't authentic.
November 2010: An extremely unpleasant experience as non-Japanese asians (i.e., if you are Japanese or perceived as Japanese, this would probably not happen to you): IT SUCKED... the moment the host saw our group, she grimaced seemingly wanting us to leave. She attempted to sit our group (with an infant, and stroller) within the middle of the crowded dining area... RIDICULOUS... she refused to have us sit at some clean, vacant booths until we made a stink... then the manager came out to pacify things with a token free appetizer. It was only a cool waiter that saved the day... too bad, the food was alright. It just left a bad It was just weird that as mostly Asians we were unwelcome in this pseudo-Asian establishment... actually nevermind that isn't so weird.
Piff Changs asi  like to call it is solid and a safe option for a casual meal out especially with a larger group. The food and service are pretty decent. They have a late happy hour as well in addition to the one from 4-6. Out of things to say about Piff Changs.  Over and out.
Blah!  The only reason I gave this place 2 stars was the service.  Other than that, just ...Blah!!! I love dumplings, but these were the worst that I have had in a long time. Also, I had the coconut curry veggies...BLAH!! I wouldn't go back at all and waste my money.
Suprisingly, this restaurant is almost always full despite the so-called recession as of November 2008 and so-so tasting cuisine. The menu selection is quite expansive; however the food quality is just not up to par.  Decor is quite fancy with mediocre service. Doesn't it get annoying when waiters mangle asian dish names? I am surprised there are over 170 PF chang's worldwide! Dishes are expensive but well presented. You can't fool me: A generous 2 stars for PF Chang's or shall I say Panda Express/Cheesecake dressed up in a tuxedo.
PF Changs - how do I love your ways....you have gotten a little ghetto recently, but the food still keeps me coming back for me.
Day/Time: Saturday Night Occasion: Dual Birthday dinner for me and my friend Reservations is definitely a great idea especially on a Saturday night in busy downtown Palo Alto. We were seated promptly  and we were ready to enjoy our evening. Food wise, love the lamb, garlic noodles, and calamari. My drink of the night was lychee martinis and please do bring me another =)   Service was slow and clumsy.  Drinks were forgotten, my second round of lychee martini was spilled all over the other birthday girl, we were CHARGED for the spilled martini and CHARGED for the replacement, and we were CHARGED for our complimentary birthday desserts.  PF Changs in Fremont I enjoyed...PF Changs in Palo Alto...wont be going back anytime soon.
Unfortunately I have to come here often for business lunches since this is a favorite of my boss.  After the first visit, I was sick of it.  It feels like a nice atmosphere restaurant with fast food quality dishes. They have quite a range of options but I have yet to try anything that keeps me wanting more.  The food is really nothing special with the exception of the lettuce wraps but you could save some money and just get that at Costco.  The entrees look great but their taste doesn't match up.  Most of their dishes seem like they are excessively doused with soy sauce or some other nasty sauce.  Making something overly salty doesn't qualify it as flavorful or tasty. On the plus side, you're always sure to get a table here for lunch without having to wait long.
I don't care if it's not authentic.   Authentic is not a requirement for me  (thinking of dogs....)  Taste is.  And I think they have some tasty dishes. Not so kid-friendly IMHO
P.F. Chang's is a chain. Which can be fine. Except there are certain similarities between locations that I find disturbing. Like consistent bad service. My boyfriend's parents were in town and wanted P.F. Chang's so off I went. The service was actually pretty good at this location. The waitress was a little unenthusiastic but she was good. Really on the ball. So what I'm saying is I might go again. Here's my problem though. I have found 3 really good items on P.F. Chang's menu: Mongolian Beef, Lettuce wraps, and the Great Wall of Chocolate. But nothing else on the menu that I've tried is ANY good. How can you have only 3 good items? I give the P.F. Chang's in Palo Alto a half-enthusiastic 3 stars. If you want better Chinese in the same price range, head to downtown Palo Alto and hit up Mandarin Gourmet. If you want reliably mediocre food, go to P.F. Chang's.
My 1st review in over two month, but I had to say something about this place. Make a reservation if you go at night like we did.  I made one before we left and we waited less than 10 minutes we we got there.  25 minutes without one.  Place was packed. The $39 meal for two deal is a good option and will save you around $9.00 if you ordered food from the regular menu.  You each choose a soup, an appetizer (lettuce wraps were good), entree and dessert (samples of their desserts in "large" shot glasses).  We ordered a separate noodle dish for the kids.  Kids' drinks are only a $1.00 each.  No crayons for the kids.  Instead, they had these bendable thin sticky sticks that you can use to make shapes.  Just follow the picture directions.  They were OK according to the kids (they played with them for about 15 minutes), but it was different than the usual coloring sheet. The soups weren't bad.  The Mongolian Beef my wife ordered was delicious.  So was the Honey Shrimp dish I ordered.  She also ordered this Eggplant dish that was very tasty as well.  Unfortunately, they brought Shrimp Fried Rice instead of the Shrimp Noodles.  They apologized and got the right order in about 10 minutes.  The desserts weren't bad either.  They guy who served them talked nice enough that my son said "he was a gentleman".  I had to call the server back so that he could hear it from my son.  My boy knows good service!  ;) We had a gift card which more than paid for the food, but we left a good tip because the service was pretty good.  Bathrooms were clean and there were no other issues. Would come here again if it wasn't so far from home.  :(
Food = Chinese food?! NOT! REALLY? ARE YOU SERIOUS?! Service = SUCKED SO BAD I can't believe they are in business. I'm pretty forgiving, but BAD FOOD + BAD SERVICE (BARTENDERS ONLY) = UNACCEPTABLE!!!!!!! I HOPE THEIR GM IS READING THIS FOR I THINK THEY HAVE A LOT OF WORK TO DO at this location. Starting with providing good service for one. To be honest... I really didn't want to go here, but a friend of mine wanted to go there. So I reluctantly gave in and we sat at the tables near the bar area. It was around 730pm. NO ONE came to greet us or give us menus. We waited about 10 minutes and finally decided to move to the bar so that our bartender could see us and wait on us. Our bartender, CHAZ barely even made any eye contact to greet me and my friend. I ordered a cup of cappuccino and it took her over 10 minutes to bring it. She forgot my spoon so I had to ask the other bartender that was working that night. Chaz NEVER checked on me again after that. Worst service EVER!!!!!! Both bartenders didn't look happy working at the bar. They both looked and put out this negative, "I'm so miserable working here. God, help me!" vibe... Did I get poor service because I didn't drink any alcohol? Did I get poor service because I didn't order dinner? IT DOESN'T MATTER what the reasons are... I NEVER liked this place anyways so I was hoping for a better dining experience... Alas... gluten free menu or not... I would probably NEVER return to this restaurant. And you know bad news travel faster than good news...
I honestly don't understand why people continue coming to this place. My own experience: We arrived at 6.20 pm and the lady in the front desk said to us that we have to wait 1 hour. We said OK. It was mother's day, understandable to same extent...No problem. After 1 hour  we sat at the table and immediately ordered the menu. After another 45 minutes the food arrived. My dish (angel pasta and prawns with lemon ) was overheated. The noodles, sticky and hard. It was evident that the plate had been overheated. We called the waiter and very kindly, he offered to bring me other noodles. It took 5 minutes more for the new noodles to arrive.  This time, freshly made, but rather over cooked. I said nothing, the only thing I wanted to do at this point was to leave. First and last time I go to this restaurant. I lost 2 hours waiting for a meal that was not worth the $ 17.45 it cost.
Here's to me, going outside my norm and trying to order new things. I love the fact that when I come here I normally don't even open a menu, as I already know what I want and know that I'm going to get exactly what I expect. This time though, I tried something new, one of their lunch specials.  It started out with egg drop soup and was followed by the orange chicken and rice.  ( I justified it to myself as being somewhat healthy, since it was chicken, even though I think it was fried, baby steps though.)  The egg drop soup was great!  I don't know how authentic, but it tasted good and was a good size.  Bigger than a cup, and not a whole bowel.  The chicken was also good, considering that I don't really like white meat chicken.  But it was healthy, covered in a fried coating, and covered in sauce.  Throw that on top of some rice, and I almost didn't know I was eating chicken. You are not coming here for real Chinese food, you're coming for Americanized Chinese food, good service, and a fun atmosphere.  And even when I veer outside of my normal dishes, I am still a pretty happy girl.
Ok, so I went to a PF Changs once in Sacramento, and I thought it was so over-rated, so over-priced, so "blah" that I wouldn't go to one again.  But, it had been several years and the PA location had a dinner-for-2 special in the paper, so we thought we'd try it out.  And they saved themselves. The special was a dinner-for-2 for $40 (cup of soup, appetizer, entree and mini desert).  We both had hot and sour soup and it was decent...nothing to write home about.  I'm not a big hot and sour fan anyway, so I gave the rest to my fiancee.  We had the fried green beans for the appetizer - I've been wanting to try those for a long time and they didn't disappoint.  I loved them - although my fiancee wasn't as impressed as I was.  But I LOVE green beans, and anything fried, so it was a pretty rare chance that those were going to fail with me. For the entree, I had the beef and broccoli which was delicious.  In fact, I'm pretty sure that's what I had the first time I went to a PF Changs and I hated it...so this time, they nailed it.  The beef was crispy on the outside, yet tender and flavorful...the broccoli was fresh and crispy.  She had the spicy chicken - which I wasn't crazy about, but she loved it. The deserts really disappointed, though.  They were VERY mini (in shot glasses).  I had the red velvet cake and it had a funky taste to it.  She had the carrot cake and said it was "so-so". But, they saved themselves from my constant "PF Changs is over-rated" rant I used to give to all my friends.  Then again, it probably IS still over-rated, but it wasn't as bad as I originally thought. 3 "solid" stars.  Just can't get myself to give a chain 4 stars on the second trip...sorry.
Holy moly, salt overload! Definitely not authentic Chinese (just take a look into their kitchen), but that still does not justify the amount of sodium I forced myself to ingest that day. Maybe I didn't order the right dishes? Out of the 5 dishes that were ordered, all 5 were horrible. Overpriced Asian fusion crappola.
Normally, when one is craving good Americanized Chinese food, you would travel over to your local PF Chang's. The one close by, in Fremont, is actually okay. Now the one in Palo Alto.... I mean, I really tried to give this place a chance. The first time I went here, I didn't like it. It was really on par with Mr. Chau's or something. Then I went to the one in Fremont, felt PF Chang's redeemed themselves, and then returned to the one in Palo Alto last weekend. I have only one equation for Yelpers to remember: EATING + BAD CHICKEN = STOMACH PROBLEMS How do I know that our Cashew Chicken was bad? Probably because we were out with another couple, ordered a bunch of dishes, but the only two people who ate the Cashew Chicken were the only two who had a sudden onset of really bad stomach problems, nausea... possible food poisoning. This place gets two stars because the other dishes were okay, but seriously... the whole Cashew Chicken fiasco put me off of this particular PF Chang's forever. That, and they put bean sprouts in their fried rice. Gross.
P.F. Chang's has good 'Chinese' food made with high quality ingredients. I know the food is not authentic Chinese, but it's pretty freaking good! The Schechuan Beef (my favorite item) is really really good and is pretty spicy (which I like), the sweet and sour chicken is good as well as the lettuce wraps (probably my second favorite thing there). They have a wide variety of soups, dishes and appetizers as well as desserts. If you have leftovers, which you probably will, don't leave them in the refrigerator too long or even at all, because you fridge will smell like food...bad! Also sometimes their food upsets my stomach (as well as my friends's too), so be careful. I like the fact that they don't charge you for rice! Make a reservation, they are always crowded around dinner!
What a failure of a day. I don't mind the food at PF Chang's -- sure, it's Americanised, and sure, it's also a little expensive. Regardless of its shortcomings, it's different and I enjoy eating it. Today I went to eat there and sat at the bar waiting for someone to serve me for 25 minutes. I made eye contact with three staff members working the bar, and nothing happened. I eventually walked out and went to the Creamery. Totally lame.
I can't write anything BUT a great review for this place. In undergrad my friends and I would have takeout from P.F. Chang's all the time, especially during exam weeks. It was perfect for feel-good food, and the portions vs. price are awesome (that's important when you're in school). Oh, and in response to some of the reviews complaining that it's Americanized Chinese food: what did you really expect??? If you want "real Chinese" food I'd suggest you go to a peking place, there are plenty of them around. ;) Anywho, my faves are the crab meat wontons, P.F.'s spicy chicken (their version of General Tsao's), the orange peel chicken, and the Singapore noodles. Mmm-mmm! I also like the fried green beans (like tempura). I was a little disappointed with the takeout places around here, so P.F.'s is a great alternative!
This place literally rocks my socks and feeds my soul (and tummy.) I cannot say one bad thing about PF Changs. Yes, its Americanized Chinese food and yes, its good as hell! I love the decor in this place- it's modern meets fung shui design meets sophisticated chic. There's this one booth in the very back-center of the restaurant that gives you a great view of the entire place. I've only been seated there once and loved it. The bf & our friends & I have eaten here dozens of times and every time, the service has been top-notch. Our waiter or waitress has always been attentive to when we needed our drinks filled and was knowledgeable about the menu items. The food! The food! I can rave on about it for a million paragraphs, but I'll try to keep it briefer than that. When the bf & I come here, our staples are: orange peel beef, pork fried rice and sichuan from the sea (usually a mix of shrimp and scallops.) But, we try to give other menu items a shot. Crispy honey chicken and wok charred beef have also been a delight to our taste buds. Unlike authentic Chinese food, Changs dishes are not greasy. The meat they use is high quality stuff and the flavors are strong. I brought my family here once for a birthday celebration and even the usual picky suspects were impressed with the food. My mom especially like the candied walnut shrimp and my little brother asked for "more hot & sour soup, please!" We ordered the desserts in shot glasses and almost threw down for the last rocky road one. Don't let the fact that PF Changs is a chain in a strip mall deter you from trying it. Its a great dining experience with flavorful food and a wonderful atmosphere. Trust me, I'm a foodie (note:sarcasm.)
Had a pretty good dinner there last night.  I've only been to one other PF Chang's and it was much better.  I really liked the spicy eggplant though. The service was pretty good however the server placed his fingers on the rim of every water glass when he put them on the table.  So I didn't say anything I just didn't drink my water.  I go by the rule that you never complain at a restaurant until you are done eating.
Inauthentic as a lot of people are complaining about, I rather like PF Chang's "fake" Chinese food (to each their own, I guess).  I like to think of it as "Chinese-lite."  Whereas at more "authentic" Chinese establishments with greasier food I leave with a rather unpleasant and heavy feeling afterward (unless I've been chugging hot tea throughout the meal), I always depart PF Changs feeling quite satisfied.  In fact, I actually just ate there for lunch today. I am a big fan of their lettuce wraps, hot and sour soup, Mongolian beef, and Chang's spicy chicken. Despite other reviews, in my several times at this Palo Alto location, I have always had great service. Overall, I really do enjoy this restaurant.  I guess I must be a dumb "white" asian (although I am from Hawai'i-- maybe living there until I left for college screwed up my taste buds).
I've enjoyed PF Changs from my time in college when it wasn't a chain yet and only one restaurant existed.  I don't go nearly as often as I used to go, but in my last visit, the food has slipped and I can only give it an average overall. I went there for lunch with a friend for my birthday and it was a nice sunny day, perfect for dining outside and the restaurant wasn't busy yet as it was pre-lunch rush.  We asked to sit outside and the hostess said that they were not sitting anyone outside that day due to lack of servers.  Too bad.  This was at 11:50 a.m.  When we left around 1 p.m., the outside tables were full of people. The food was a bit bland and the mini-dessert was awful.  However, our server was excellent.
Here's the good news: 1) The establishment is open later than most places near it's location. 2) Great asthetics. Large, open room. Kind of gets loud but it has a very social feel to it. and the dissapointments: 1) MSG 2) MSG 3) MSG This food doesn't taste like food! A coconut curry has very little flavor, the vegetables are overcooked, and for a curry, there was very little sauce. Oh, and if you have Kung Pao (which is supposed to be spicy), expect it to taste like peanuts. Yeah, that's right- Kung Pao Peanuts. Unfortunately, your not going to get flavor from their food because it isn't food. It's MSG.
Going to an "Asian Bistro" you have to adjust your expectations accordingly.  It is unreasonable to expect authentic food because this restaurant is not trying to make authentic food. We went for dinner on a Sunday night.  Since we hit peak, we had to wait for 10 minutes, which wasn't bad.  We basically had time to review the menu when our pager buzzed. We ordered hot and sour soup, the crunchy green bean appetizer, mu shu chicken and shrimp with candied walnuts.  The hot and sour soup had some kind of unusual stock (veal? beef?) and too much soy sauce.  By the way, always order the bowl at $5.95 rather than the $2.95 cup because the bowl contains at least 6 cups of soup. The crunchy bean appetizer was the best dish of the night.  The lightly tempura battered green beans were tender and sweet and accompanied by sriracha mayonnaise. The mu shu chicken was folded table side which has its pros and cons.  The plus that you have ready-to-eat mu shu is more than outweighed by the fact that any portions which are not eaten immediately will continue to get soggy on the platter.  Better to ask the server to only wrap two and leave the rest.  Also, the pancakes were more like tortillas. The shrimp with candied walnuts came mixed with honeydew melon balls.  Whoever prepped the melon balls didn't know how to use a melon baller (there were flat spots on the melon balls) and the honeydew was not ripe.  I don't know if that was intentional because a ripe honeydew might have been too sweet.  In any case, this dish didn't work. We received great service from everyone, including our server Brittany, who was both cute and competent.  She deserved and got an over-tip. Credit for having clearly laid out vegetarian and gluten-free dining options. I can't really recommend this place because it is simply too easy to get really good real Chinese food in the Bay Area.  Although the portions are generous, you are clearly paying extra for the location and decor, the ability to have a caipirinha with dinner, and the option to have a real dessert afterwards.  Two stars for the food plus one for the great service.
Solid 3-stars.  Usually crazy busy if you go on a Friday or Weekend evening.  Probably because it is part of Stanford Mall. Food is always tasty.  Nothing special.  It's definitely americanized-Chines food.  So what?  It's not authentic, but you know that going into it :) Highlights: *Garlic Noodles.  Tasty & refreshing.  A hint of spice from the chili flakes that makes your lips tingle a little after.  But so good.  The garlic sauce they put on the noodles is delicious.  There are also fresh cucumbers chopped up over the noodles as well.  Simple dish, but super good. *Vegetarian Lettuce Wraps.  This filling is soooo good.  Love the lettuce wraps! *Vegetarian Dumplings [Pan-Fried].  Their veggie filling is not the typical carrots and random veggies.  They actually manage to make a hearty filling, that even a carnivore would enjoy.  Great flavors. This last time we went for a girls night and had their Pear Bellini's.  Actually very good! Downside: Some of their servers aren't that great.  The one we had the other night was grumpy and aloof.  He seemed to be only 1/2-listening when we were ordering and sort of did the bare minimum as far as waiting tables goes.
Most flavorless Chinese food I've ever had. I'm not into reviewing chains but I thought that PF was supposed to be good and really, how can you make flavorless Asian good? Fish sauce, oyster sauce, soy sauce, garlic, onions etc. Flavorful options abound but I guess not at PF. I went for a friend's bday dinner. I wasn't that hungry so I was pretty open to eating anything and I'd had never had PF Changs. Booo - any hole in the wall place beats PF. Seared Ahi Tuna - not bad. I'd order again. Hot & Sour Soup - SALTY!!! Orange Beef  - orange flavor too strong, less zest in the sauce Broccoli Chicken w/ Ginger - not special. anyone can make this. the broccoli was also too big to capture any of the ginger sauce. chicken was dry because they used chicken breast. (i don't like chicken breast...) Sweet & Sour Chicken - kinda bland. not sweet enough or sour enough Sweet and Sour Rice Noodles - bland and cheap tasting. no depth of flavor Beef Chow Fun - Boooo! Booo! I am a noodle lover and this was a huge disappointment. They used egg noodles and not the oooey gooey regular chow fun noodles. Was also greasy and needed salt. Mongolian Beef - the most passable dish. Good Flavor. Too greasy tho. We also had a few of the dessert shots. Aight...pretty standard chain dessert fare. Guess this is what passes for good Chinese food in the burbs. Yeah, I won't be back again unless it's for a celebration of some sort and everyone picks it.
We had reservation at 8 40 was seated very promptly. Then  it took 10 to 15 minutes before our dizzy waitress who kept playing with her teething ring on her tongue took our order. We gave her our drinks and meal order at the same time, it took at least 10 to 15 minutes to get the liquids, needless to say  MY DRINK WAS WATERED DOWN. Then dishes then came rolling in, we started with the chicken salad, which  had mayonnaise for a dressing horrible, then the pot stickers, which was edible, we ordered sesame chicken, it seemed  they forgot to put the sesames on it , etc.. etc..  as for the rest of the mea it was about the same. I have eaten at PFC  maybe a dozens  times at least.The food was just as bad as the service. Until I hear that they have improved, they will not see me there anymore.
PF Changs is the Denny's of Chinese food. My husband and I passed up our favorite Chinese resturant in Palo Alto, Jing Jings, for PF Changs. We were looking for a bit more ambiance, a nice adult drink and food for our food challenged child.  What a mistake.  The best thing about this place was the wiki sticks that entertained our kids until the food arrived.  The drinks were fine, but the hot and sour soup was overly thick and way too salty.  The lettuce cups (that I was looking forward to) were greasy and only came with 4 lettuce leafs.  They were passable, but not the wonderful dish everyone seems to rave about.  The other dish we had , though filled with fresh veggies, was unflavorful.  We walked away feeling disappointed and thinking that Safeway Chinese take out would have been about as tasty.
The waitstaff are a bunch of morons. In fact, I used to know someone who worked there and, well, she was a moron. Anyway, I absolutely love their kung pao chicken, even if it's really not kung pao chicken. It's an Americanized version, but it works well and that's the only thing I will get. I'm too afraid of being even more disappointed.
So I am not expecting too much and was actually disappointed: silverware dirty (each and every piece), tables at the bar where I sat were not properly cleaned; the lettuce in the salad was old. There ia an ongoing failure of management and no QUALITY CONTROL.  Once management fixes the quality control problems let me know. No praises here!
I was thinking of just writing "no" so I didn't have to explain how confused I was when I ate here. I mean it looks like its quality on the outside and even on the inside but yeah, no. Anyways, instead a simple no, I will enlighten you on my experience. I went to PF Chang's with my work team, we are about 19 people ranging from my age to older and from all ethnicities. Some enjoyed the experience as it was comfortable and familiar. I personally was confused on how you could screw something up so bad that I barely touched my meal. This place isn't so great, they tried hard but not hard enough. Before I went, I had heard a lot about the indecent food at PF Chang's from my friends so I tried to come in with optimism. Still, I was disappointed. I know people, especially Chinese people like myself, who gripe about Americanized Chinese food and seriously, I am not one to hate on Americanized Chinese food. I love the "bad Chinese Food" at Panda Express and even the General Tso's Chicken found at the Safeway deli but PF Chang's is not even good "bad Chinese food". I often use the argument that McDonald's doesn't serve real hamburger meat in their Big Mac but the Big Mac its still crave-able and o-so-good and no one compares a Big Mac with a Ruth's Chris Angus Beef burger. In the same way,  fake or "bad" Chinese food can still be good food. PF Chang's was a sad disappointment. I was indeed expecting the sweet and sour and saltier style of Chinese food popular to the Pan Asian experience but I did not anticipate the meat to be dry, the vegetables to be old, or the calamari to be stale. I did get a chance to sample each of my co-workers dishes and I must say, there were a few things that were OK. So, If I was forced to come back here for a business meeting or something I would go for the steamed fish or the roast duck, maybe the lettuce wrap or the dumplings for a starter. Everything else is pretty much a no go. The atmosphere is like a hip steak house and the wait staff is mostly Caucasian. Just think of it as a version of Bonefish Grill or Cheesecake Factory that serves Chinese food. The menu has explanations of the dishes in terms of the region in China the dish is known for and the flavor you will get with it. You have to give them credit for creating a pretty friendly environment for an eclectic group. Price wise, you are paying for the atmosphere only. Forget about the food, $20 a person is a bit much for just the atmosphere. Oddly, my fortune cookie read "Your positive character will influence many." So, in that light, I give them two stars for trying.
Very Americanized Chinese food. I agree with someone else's review who wrote that it's the Cheesecake Factory of Chinese. The food is still good nonetheless. I usually get their chicken lettuce wraps - yum! Why do they get a 2 star then? You would think being a large chain restaurant, with a large staff that they would have their shit together. We came in around 12:45pm for lunch and were told by the hostess that it would be a 30 -40min wait for a party of 3. I looked around and saw about 8 tables that were waiting to be bused and figured it would be much shorter than that. WRONG. They just never got around to busing those tables which is why the wait was so long. After waiting 40min, 5 of those 8 tables still needed to be cleared and set. Seriously? Does it really take that long to clear off the dishes and give the table a quick wipe down? I think not. Starving, we spotted an tiny empty table at the bar and decided just to eat there. The waitress didn't clean the table very well and basically just wiped the crumbs from the table onto our chairs. Also, she screwed up our fried rice order.
"Hi. Can I get some average Chinese food with way too much salt and a shitload of grease that tastes decent? Oh I'm going to pay too much for it? But you have a horse statue outside? That works. Thanks." True story: I once downloaded research reports on PF Chang's and The Cheesecake Factory that cost my firm close to $5000 because I really wanted to understand why they were so great. Then I realized I was on crack and haven't been to either in almost 2 years. "When I was a child I spoke as a child I understood as a child I thought as a child; but when I became a man I put away childish things." (Cor. 13:11). Thank God for that.
I find this particular location to be consistently good and they are open relatively late. The service has always been friendly and the ambience is nice. Maybe the food isn't traditional Chinese, but who cares? It isn't claiming to be. Frankly a lot of traditional Chinese restaurants in the area aren't too great, though there are some good ones. Just love seeing all the low ratings from people saying it's not Asian. Get a grip!
*GLUTEN FREE MENU* (5 stars for the gluten free menu) Need I say more? If you too have Celiac, or a wheat allergy, then you understand how nice it is to walk into a restaurant and be able to order straight off a menu without going through it with a fine toothed comb to find the 2 or 3 items that "might" be gluten free (or at least wheat free). While some may argue that PF Chang's is the "Cheesecake Factory" of Chinese food, I have to give this place five stars for having a delicious gluten free menu, with many different options, that all taste good. At my most recent trip, I ordered the GF Lettuce Wraps, GF Chang's Spicy Chicken, and the GF Beef with Broccoli. So good. I know, I know, its not authentic in anyway, and its nothing like the amazing little hole in the wall restaurants that have really fantastic Chinese food. The point is that the food tastes good, its easy to order, and its a stress free eating experience, like the good old days before you knew you couldn't eat wheat, barley, and rye gluten. Three cheers and 5 stars for PF Chang's and their gluten free menu. Thank you so much for making eating out easy once again!
We just love this place! Yeah, it's Americanized Chinese food, but it tastes sooo GOOD!!! My wife loves the sauces, I just love to eat (of course). My Favs: Mongolian Beef Kung Pao Scallops and of course the lesser known 'Ring of Fire' hot sauce (don't be ashamed, ask for it by name!!) My Wife's Favs: Mongolian Beef (she's just copying me) Honey Shrimp Crab Wonton's (I like those too, and yes I'm just copying her)
I am a huge fan of P.F. Chang's. I always forget just how good and tasty it is until the next time I go.  This locations is okay - lots of room & good service. Their Mai-Tai's are fantastic!
I went a while back for someone's birthday at work.  I would never choose to eat here.  I thought the meats were way too sweet or salty and the portions very small for the price.  If I were dining for the experience, I might've been ok with it but I am not looking for a special experience when I eat at a chain restaurant. The service was really good though.   Drinks were always full and  a couple of our dishes came out 1 minute after the others so the manager took them off the bill.  Maybe they had just opened or something.
Here continues my illicit love affair with Chang-ers. Illicit because I know it's not authentic and I'll lose any um, street cred I might have had. I like this Chang-ers better than the Sunnyvale one. I'm not sure why - the Sunnyvale one has multiple rooms and looks a little more upscale. Maybe it's because I've never had to wait an hour at the one in Paly. Or maybe it's because it was the first place I got to go out after having surgery (albeit I still arrived at the restaurant with a giant cast on my schnozz). Anyway, the Orange Peel Beef and Buddha's Delight I had last night were awesome. It was my first (and I'm sure not the last!) time  I had the B.D. and it was full of the kind of veggies you want (asparagus, snap peas, broc) and not the ones that are just filler (cabbage and onion), all mixed with just the subtlest of sauces.
OK so I know it's a chain, but I expected service to be a little better.  We went today for lunch.  I called and made a reservation as a co-worker was leaving the company and we were having his farewell lunch (his choice). When we arrived we were greeted by the two hostesses engaged in deep conversation (not in english - not that I have a problem with that, just saying) and stood there for a couple minutes before being acknowledged.  When we told them we had a reservation, they looked at each other for a bit and finally one said, we'll get your table ready right now.  Should have been a sign, but I didn't really pay any mind. At first our server was attentive, but then she must have gotten a few other tables seated in her section cause she seemed to disappear for long periods of time.  Someone else brought our food out, but then he took our appetizer plates and we sat there for several minutes before anyone returned with new plates.  We were going to order dessert, but it took so long for her to bring the to go boxes that we had to leave. Also, it seemed as though our tables were really close together - trying to cram as many seats in as possible I guess. Anyways, our food was tasty so that's why they get 2 stars. Oh and we had to ask for fortune cookies as we were leaving because they didn't come with the check.
P.F. Chang's, you bother me because you don't deliver.  Seriously, WTF?  In Shallow Alto, land of the working lunch you don't deliver?  We'd use you for lunches far more often if you did, think about that, ok? This isn't authentic Chinese, but then, it's a chain, so you really should know that already.  It is, however, yummy and reliable.  Service tends to be friendly, though not always fast, the wine list leaves something to be desired, but the mixed drinks hit the spot.  It's location at the end of the Stanford Mall makes it an ideal place to stop for a bite after a long day of holiday shopping, being in the mall also gives it the enviable advantage of having it's own parking lot which, if you've ever spent any time searching for a spot around University, is a mark in it's favor indeed. 3.5 Stars
Hardly impressive. The calamari was chopped into little bitty pieces to make it look like the dish was bigger than it's supposed to be. Pepper steak was salty.... Street noodles was... could be better if you went to a hole-in-a-wall and made it yourself. It took them a fair bit of time just to get more water or at least some tea. You'll need to ask for it. Yup majority of the food is salty. There was a small pile of salt and pepper right beside the calamari (they seem to know the dish was tasteless) Fusion food sucks and this stands right next to Zao. Expect lots of customers who don't know real good Asian food. Honestly this place is embarrassing particularly if you are ASIAN!
I ate here today for the first time in a long time. Service:  The waitress was nice and all but she almost never checked on our table. Food:  The vegetable chow fun seemed undercooked (at least the noodles).  The Ginger chicken w/broccoli was decent.  The salt and pepper calamari was pretty good It's a normal chain type place (like CPK or cheesecake factory)... the quality is always up to a certain level but never more.
I have to admit that although P.F. Chang's is anything but authentic, I tend to enjoy some of their dishes.  Maybe it's the umami I enjoy, who knows? This location always seems busy to me, but then again it's next to a shopping center.  Parking is ok, since they are located in the corner of a sea of a parking lot. When I walked in, the host pissed me off.  He straight up didn't see me standing to the side of the desk, and at that made me walk to the front though a bunch of people to talk with him.  Idiot... My friend and I had already eaten, so we headed to the bar after we realized we didn't need to wait.  Walking to the bar, we realized this place was a zoo.  A semi-choreographed dance of waiters, food runners, and other staff seemed to be running around non-stop the entire time I was here. It took us a little bit to get the bar tender's attention, but he apologized for that and had a drinks to us fairly quickly.  I had the sake flight, which was only $7 and wasn't half-bad.  My friend had the Chinese 88.  Since the bar was packed, somehow they made an extra drink, so she got 2 for the price of one basically.  Although it wasn't on the menu at this location, I have had the 'Forbidden City Tea' and it's to-die-for. Having sat right next to the take out section, I noticed that most of the dishes seemed small in portion to what I was used to seeing, but I wasn't going to complain since we didn't order any entrees.  Instead, we decided on having some mini desserts.  Picture a little cake or tiramisu seemingly cut into tall blocks and stuffed into shot glasses, and you have the idea of their mini desserts.  Seriously, for $2, how can you go wrong? All-in-all this isn't a bad place.  When I think of Chinese, this place does NOT come to mind.  If I'm wanting a good cocktail and some faux Asian food, then this can definitely be my choice of poison.
I've been to three P.F. Chang's and always loved the food. From this location, my family has picked up take-out fairly regularly and eaten-in once. P.F. Chang's is always my vote amongst the take-out options! I love the lettuce wraps, spring rolls, black bean shrimp, mixed vegetables, and other seafood dishes. The prices seem a bit high for medium-sized portions but I'm almost always lucky enough to not be footing the bill.... When I ate in, I enjoyed the decor and loved the cocktail selection. I sipped on an excellent mojito and enjoyed every last drop and mint leaf! Check out the bathrooms for some of the coolest sinks around. Random, I know...
I hadn't been here in a few years and I'm not sure I'll go back. We ordered for starters: Plain ribs - veryyyy dry, Lettuce wraps - did not taste fresh and just didn't have any good flavors at all and did not taste good (this used to be my favorite), Calamari - very very good, steak flatbread (quesadilla) also good. Iced tea very good and service was nice as well.
I come here all the time.  I really like their cocktails and their appetizers.  Sometimes they mess up and something taste totally out of the norm, but 9/10 times they're consistent with the taste and texture. The wait can be really bad sometimes since the stores at this mall seem to close very early.  By 8 pm on a Saturday.  Who does that?  So the "late" crowd pours in here for dinner.  I find it easier to just go to the bar which is hidden far far in the back away from the loud crowds. Most of their appetizers are good, I like their calamari and spare ribs the most.  The ribs are a bit chewy, but most Chinese ribs aren't fall off the bone tender.  Really good sauce though. My favorite dish is the wok seared lamb.  Even if you're not a fan of lamb, I would suggest at least trying it.  For 14 bucks, it isn't a horrible price either.  It's good for a sit down restaurant without a break the bank price tag.
I really like PF Changs. To be clear - I am not a fan of "authentic" Chinese food or much asian food. I like it Americanized. Not ashamed to admit it.   And PF Chang's does a great job :) The chicken is always good quality white meat. No surprises. I LOVE their chicken lettuce wraps. Love, love, love them. I've gotten them elsewhere and they are never as good. Love their chicken fried rice as well. It's nowhere near as greasy as it is when ordered anywhere else. I crave this stuff!  The hot and sour soup is also a favorite. And again, when I order it elsewhere, it's never as good. Their orange chicken, lemon shrimp and moo goo gai pan are my favorite entrees. The service is always good. I've been there both when slammed busy with lunch and dinner crowds or when it's quiet and the service is great no matter what. I've been to the Palo Alto, Cupertino and Reno locations. I like that I know my food will be good and the service efficient and friendly. I just wish there was one closer to me! But it's an excuse to go to Stanford Shopping Center :)
After a day of exploring Stanford's campus, PF Changs was our destination for dinner. It's a chain restaurant, so you know exactly what to expect, but it's nice when the good food is complemented with attentive service. I can't complain. The lettuce wraps are really tasty, by the way.
I have never tried PF Chang bistro before and I COULD have left it like that.  But my BF said he liked PF Chang's food in San Diego and suggested that we check out the resto in PA when he comes to Bay Area. We went the day before Valentine and had our reservation at 8:45PM.  We were there by 8PM and we were seated immediately.  We ordered the lettuce wraps, cantaloupe shrimp and cantonese chow fun.  The lettuce wrap was okay not so great.  When I got the chow fun, I was disappointed to see that the noodles were not cooked properly.  Also the noodle tasted more like pasta noodle than like a rice noodle.  I know its Americanized Chinese resto but still you gotta keep the basics!! The chow fun plate looked like it was tossed with plain soy sauce (the ones for dipping) and added some scallions and thats about it.  It lacked flavor, texture and it was bit salty too.. ugh!! Some waiter he came to our table and left a spring roll dish to our table and left the next second.  He did not even ask if we ordered it.  But when we mentioned this to the host he took care of it and also we had the rolls for free - so one star for the host.
Underwhelmed. While I've had decent PF Changs, this location missed the mark. I came here to get some takeout... the bartender who took my order was nice and the food was packaged well. However, the food wasn't good, and certainly not up to the level I've experienced at other locations in Southern CA. I got the lettuce wraps... the chicken seem overly cooked, and it didn't come with the usual sauce (some other pink sauce). I had tried to order a green salad, but they won't do that, so I got the chicken chopped salad without chicken. It was just OK. Bottom line... something seems to be off at this location. I'll look to other places when I want some takeout.
First time here and was very impressed. Maybe it was because we mentioned it was our first time here because everything was perfect.  Our server was Ashley and she was great.  She was very knowledgeable about EVERYTHING.  In fact you could ask her a question and get a 10 minute response LOL.  Teasing.. but yes she is a great talker and made the evening fun.  We made reservations, that's the way to go otherwise you could be waiting up to 45 minutes on the weekends. Our drinks were so good. I recommend the PF-X.  It may be a little froo froo but it tasted like juice and you could easily drink about 12 of them.  So good! The food was wonderful. We loved the crab wontons. The honey ginger chicken and Mongolian beef just melted in your mouth. This is not your average chinese food place.  They only use the best ingredients and everything is fresh. Service was quick as well. The manager even came over and spoke to us and welcomed us as a first time diner. He even gave us a voucher for a free appetizer for our next visit.  Very happy with everything. Cant wait to go back!
Not a good value for the price.The food is average at best as well as the service.I had the Kung Pou and it was very dry.I was going to ask them to replace but the service was so slow I did not have another hour to waste.Save your money and go elsewhere.
I'm not a huge chinese food fan. The most chinese I'll go to is Panda Express in the local mall, and that's stretching it. But I was pleasantly surprised with this place. Although their hostesses are as snobby as they come and will give you a once over if you're in anything but dolce, the wait staff are pretty friendly. I really liked the chicken lettuce wraps, and could seriously hold the lettuce next time and just lick the chicken off the plate. I had the black bean chicken which I chose for its tameness since never having been there before. I could definitely go up in heat next time. My boyfriend had a cumin spiced lamb dish which was tasty but way too salty. I'd say their best feature was the dessert.
You know what to expect from PF Chang's: Americanized "Chinese" food dishes, a loud and/or crowded dining area, mediocre service. My most recent visit to this place was actually really good. I'd like to give it 4 stars, but in fairness to the places I've rated 4 stars, I can't put PF Chang's up there. Service here should be better, and the dining area needs to be quieter. The seabass tastes too fishy (you know what I mean!). And it's really hard to find something that is relatively "healthful" on the menu. I complain about this because it's NOT traditional Chinese food, and therefore should offer lighter options. On the plus side, a new feature they've added are mini-desserts. You can order just one, and they're served in tall shot glasses. If you're the sort of person who wants just a little something sweet after having a heavy meal, this is for you. For me, a fortune cookie doesn't cut it (too bland and not chocolatey or fruity enough), and the full-size desserts are gargantuan. So I was absolutely thrilled to see this addition. The tea options here (all manner of hot tea, and somewhat-fruity-flavored iced tea) make me happy, and despite the inherent problems, I'll probably come back here. It's all about having realistic expectations. Give Chang's a try if you can make a reservation or can stand the wait. On a recent weeknight, a table for 2 was seated in less than 10 minutes.
PF China's Bistro is definitely Asian FUSION. How many bistros are there in Beijing? PF Chang's has a cheerfully campy interior, with a mural of children at play as well as terra cotta soldiers. There are cocktails on the list such as Buddha's Delight. A drawback is that the place can get NOISY. A convenient way of handling this issue is ordering online, then eating the nice hot food at home. The food (most of it is fried) tends towards the spicy and sweet. The orange shrimp, the Kung Pao scallops, the lemon chicken--a smorgasbord of wonderful tastes. PF Chang's is fun food. PF Chang's brings the Middle Kingdom to your plate... or your dining room!
I had a terrible experience there with confusion on my reservation. Apparently there were supposed to be two reservations and they were written down as one. We went in because we were celebrating my sister's birthday. When we arrived, we sat down and began to order when suddenly the lady with the other reservation came to our table and was yelling at us for taking her reservation. We were very confused and kept talking amongst ourselves. During the entire time she kept pointing at our table while talking to the people who were sitting with her. My family was very annoyed by this so we talked to management and a manager went over to speak to the woman to make sure she stopped. Eventually she came over to our table and apologized for her behavior, but it was too late because our dinner had been ruined. I would not choose this place again for a family dinner because of their lack of organization. We did get a discount on our tab, but that did not make a big difference.
lots of parking.  you need to pay attention to which side is the front near the entrance. so we went here for father's day.  we went here just to eat here. the food was good.  the price was too high.  I mean the food and ingredients are good but really?  i can't believe that other places can't serve what they serve here and just as good. okay, they might take a little more extra care in preparing the food.  it tastes good BUT its a touch bit overseasoned.  its tasty to the untrained pallet...but i'm not calling yours or anyone else's pallet untrained. BUT if you have a father on a LOW SALT diet, You know salty and not salty. Give this place a shot, its pretty good.  Its worth a trip for ONE time at least.  its kind of a nice place. Though it could get a lower star for how long it takes.  I'll still give it a 3.  Because a 2 or lower means.  Don't even Bother.
A fine place to dine.  Sadly, the more I come here, the less I like it.  PF Chang's does not use food coloring in their sweet and sour pork, bonus!  I don't come out of here with a horrible salt headache, this alone is maybe worth a 5-star rating for Chinese.  I still like Chang's chicken -- yummy stuff.  This location is incredibly busy, so I always call ahead to see what the wait will be. If you hate the sauce mixing, be aware that they seem to simply make the sauce now and don't do a silly show around it anymore.  Weelll, most of the servers don't do that.
I'm utterly appalled at the negative reviews PF Chang's has gotten here on Yelp! As Kelly B. said "I  know it's probably more hip to say that I didn't like my meal at PF Changs, but .... I had a great time." I've dined here quite a number of times, my most recent time being dinner tonight, and I've never experienced anything worth complaining over. My dinner partner and I spent four hours at The Chang's and let me tell you, our waitress didn't rush us out by any stretch of the imagination. I know, I know, four hours? We had appetizers, main courses, dessert and knocked back about four glasses of wine in the process. Definitely an enjoyable meal. The Flourless Chocolate Dome we had for dessert was totally out of this world. Eating the entire thing by yourself would surely result in a new cavity or two sprouting up in your mouth. It was seriously that rich. BUT you know if it's that rich, it tastes THAT good! I highly highly highly reccommend it.
I like the food at PF Changs. This one is okay. Staff seemed a little stressed despite it being 1:30 (post lunch crowd). The lettuce wrap appetizer is always delicious and crispy, and the sauces add a visual effect. The chow fun meat was very good, but the noodles were kind of glopped together. With chow fun, this can happen, but shouldn't happen. The lamb dish was somewhat dry, but had a very tasty earthy flavor. The garlic noodles were light, and a little sweet. I would give the place 2.5 stars and would encourage more attentive wait staff (check the beverages and no "any room for dessert" add on sale.) Comfortable setting, below average service, medium food. I think you folks can do better.
If there's a rating of 0.5 stars, that would be it. And what is the 0.5 stars for? Just the service. They are the only nice thing about the place. The food is 200% chinese-AMERICAN...or should i say AMERICAN-chinese food. Its not in anyway authentic chinese at all. Just plain horrifying is the best way i can describe the food that comes out. It may look decent...but once you taste it, all you can think about is - "this is chinese food?????" Yah, just to wrap up: if you are looking for real chinese food, this is NOT it. If you've grown up liking the americanised chinese cuisine, then you'd probably say its good. =P (p.s. I'm NEVER going back.) (p.p.s. The whole chilli mixed with musturd or watever is just too fusion for me)
I genuinely use to hate this place, while in high school. However, since returning to Palo Alto, this place has grown on me. While it could be a family restaurant, the people and clientele, it best serves are the young professionals or those seeking a date spot. Thumbs goes to the mini-dessert section, which encourages everyone, despite how "full" they are to order something. At $2, these dessert "shots" are the perfect size and price after a wonderful, filling meal. Also for those of us, who don't really eat leftovers, the restaurant's portions are reasonable and at a decent price for Palo Alto fare.
It's PF Chang's - my first experience was in Chicago and things didn't differ much back here in CA.  Can't fault our waiter; very attentive and pleasant.  Steamed salmon with ginger is delicious; we had some fried beef thing which wasn't as great. Make sure to leave room for the banana spring rolls for dessert, but share it between two.
PF Changs Palo Alto...the Gluten Free review..... This is the ONE place I know I can get Gluten Free Chinese, so it's not like I can compare much.   I recently went this weekend and was SUPER glad to find that they added like 5 more entree's to the gluten free menu.  I tried two of the new spicy dishes and found....guess what....FLAVOR!!! like actual spice to the dishes...amazing!  My #1 complaint with the previous menu would be bland gluten free items.  My #2 complaint: where the heck is the food worthy of $13 a dish!?  #3 complaint: practically NO veggie dishes, and ONE noodle dish WTH people?!  #4 complaint: why do I get handed fortune cookies which are not gluten free if I just ordered only GF items?? Service: pretty much is super duper blah here.  Have to flag some one down for water.  Front desk people who look bored and couldn't give a darn about customers. Ambiance: looks are decent, music is terrible (what you'd expect to hear while shopping at Macy's, not at a Chinese restaurant), and at this location in particular....KIDS EVERYWHERE, crying etc.  This location pulls the Stanford University and Stanford Hospital crowd, so there are many familys of sick people and out of town athletes here...just don't say I didn't warn you!
I usually don't like big chain restraurants. BUT, i do like lettuce wraps, salt&pepper calamari, and the orange chicken here. So, i will come to this place once in a while to indulge. I like coming during the week, after the lunch rush, sit at the bar and have a few drinks and eat. Also, the pear mojitos are pretty damn good.
I some times eat low carb dinners to keep slender, I don't mind eating here at all! My recomendation is the oolong sea bass dinner plate. Its served with a bed of spinich.  It's my favorite!!! The meal is also served with rice , I choose the brown rice! The bar is my prefered place to sit.. Friendly bartenders and customers .. I like their take on a bloody mary .. Spicy!
Came here to celebrate my mother-in-law birthday. We ordered the veg. lettuce wrap , fS&P calamari for appetizer and for dinner we order singaporean  noddles,  Dandan noodles, Gren beans side, orange peel shrimp, Mongolian beef and others... All the food were eatable but not good.  Green beans were soggy and everything else was soggy and lump (overcooked in sauce or just sitting in the hot lamp_) I will definitely not going back again.
Disappointing food but... It must have been beautiful people night because I have never seen such pulchritude (male and female) in a Palo Alto restaurant.  My poor college age sons were stuck with their old dad while tight jeans and pradas paraded around. The decor is standard for PF Chang but this one is a bit better than others I've been in. I forgot what  one son ordered but whatever it was it was sent back; I do remember an overpowering ginger flavor.  The lettuce wraps were ok but not great.  The beef with broccoli had tender meat and the broccoli was cooked just right ..call it al dente but cooked.  The sauce was nothing special. Service was fair (they were real busy) but got much much better after number 1 son sent his food back. I got the impression that people "make the scene" here rather than come for the food.
I am basing the review on a whole experience and considering this is a chain. As a chain I think they got the system down. When I travel I get some PF Changs for dinner in the city I am at (unless a local option is available or I am feeling adventureous). Why? Bc I know what the food will taste like. Just like Starbucks. Service is also consistently great. I had several parties in the Palo Alto one and they are very accomodating with what tables I want specifically as well as not charging for bringing our own cake, etc and occassionally for splitting the check ..:) My favorite is the steamed seabass, salt and pepper prawns, chicken lettuce wraps and garlic noodle. For a party of 8 and 10 dishes price per person was 17 dollars (6 ppl paying) that is not a bad at all considering it is palo alto.
Unless I'm desperate for really Americanized Chinese foodm is when I am in here. The first time I went here, the food wasn't really all that spectacular. So I didn't see what the whole big hubbub was about. The second time I went, I waited an half an hour, when the hostess told me it would be a fifteen minute wait. Several people who came in after me and my friends, were seated before us. Usually I'll understand if they have reservations, and I'll shrug it off. But the hostess sat three parties who walked in with no reservation, skipping us. I asked to speak with the manager, and when I told him that I've been wating longer than I was told, AND that the hostess seated three parties that entered after my party, he shrugged it off and said it was a busy night. It was rude! and the Manager didn't care.
I'll start off by saying this is my wife's favorite "Chinese" restaurant.  I'll also add that my wife isn't a real fan of REAL Chinese food like the kind you get at one of those Chinese restaurants that's overrun by Chinese people.  You know the kind of restaurant of which I speak.  If you do see caucasians dining at these restaurants, they are either tourists who wandered off the beaten track or are true white buddahs who know where to get a great meal cheap! Believe me, these white brothers and sisters will even order bitter melon! Anyway, back to PF Chang's.  I'd have to say their food is tasty, though a bit sparse.  They have a tendency to overdue it with the hoisin, soy and oyster sauce at times.  Actually, the best dish at this place is their dessert which is or was called the Great Wall!  A monsterous slice of chocolate cake which is to die for.  I also have to say that the ambience is quite nice and it is a great place to take people for Chinese food who don't really like Chinese food!  Let's face it, a family of four can eat until they can eat no more at a real Chinese restaurant for the price of a meal for two at PF Chang's.  Not only that, the two who dined at PF Chang's will have plenty of room left for the Great Wall because the servings are closer to skimpy than generous!
Ni Hao! (thx Kai Lan!) Boyyyyy I tell ya! Good Chinese food outside of San Francisco is hard to come by. I guess it's because I've built this kinda of prejudice, that when it comes to certain food genres, SF has it locked hands down (Chinese and Mexican burritos [I guess you can say Mexican, but are they really? Burritos are indeed a Cali thing from what I remember in my street food history lessons... {oh man! I have to Wiki this...brb.....................thoughts within a thought thats's within a thought..crazy huh?................................................aha! Cali it is! Amazing huh!?}]). But I digress! So me and mi siddy Julietonz were trynna tame the growling food box (I think I scared the white people on CalTrain). I figured, "what the hayward, california? Let's roll my ninja!". SO! The hostess? Madddd cute! As well as the other 3 waitresses on staff. Already got a star there. (LOL, I knooooow! I'm sorry!) For starters, we shared ( I KNOOOOOW! A SAMOAN SHARING FOOD!) the crab wontons. It was decent! Not hella greasy like other places seem to have 'em and they were a pretty good size (hefty hefty hefty). For main, we went with: Orange Peel Chicken - Not too big on spicy food, but it was fairly good with a glaze that didn't had some bite to it. Cooked well though! Crispy Honey Chicken - this was gooood! the tatse wasn't too overbearing, and the chicken was still juicy as a mug! plus there was hella?? Yessir! Beef w/ Broccoli - It's kinda hard NOT to get BWB at a Chinese restaraunt even though Im not a huge fan of it anyways. But this was pretty good. A tad bit salty, but over rice and ya can't really tell. The onnnnnly thing though that messed up the 5 star was the green tea they gave me. NAWWWWWWSTY! I didn't know whether to spit it out or throw it in the face of the guy behind me who kept backing it on up U-haul truck right into my chair. NO BUENO! BUT! 4 stars EASY though! And did I mention the waitresses were cute?? LOL DONE!
I am very sad to see the bad reviews for this place. As a Chinese person, I don't go to expensive Chinese places (meaning anything over 6$ a dish lol) unless there is a family function, but my boyfriend and I went here because the California Pizza Kitchen was closed. I actually like the place a lot. We went very late (about 8:30) so the tables were all nearly empty at that point. The wait staff was nice, but not too attentive, the food was pretty good, and the restaurant is very nice from the inside. Actually it much nicer than being in a normal Chinese restaurant. And I have to agree with others that have said that the portion sizes are reasonable. I think this place is a little pricey for this type of food, and the service was a little slow, but I was surprised that I liked the food so much.
This is now one of my favorite places for dinner. The food is 110% delicious and the service was great. I don't know what happend to other people who reviewed saying they had poor service, but I had no complaints. The manager even came to our table to make sure every thing was ok. Every thing from the drinks to appeitizers to dessert was sooo good! And to all the people complaining about it's not authentic chinese food, well no crap it's PF Changs in Palo Alto at the Stanford Shopping Mall, what do you expect. Even so the food is just soo good. If you go get the seabass (you will not be let down) and the mongolian beef...hmmmm I'm hungry right now!!! The server himself said we ordered 2 of the the best things on the menu. The atmosphere was also really nice. It would be a good place for a bday or with just a large group of people.
First off, I used to work here so I am not sure if that makes me a better judge or just a biased one?  I used to eat here before and while I was working there but after months of serving, it became apparent that this food wasn't all that great.  Though the service and the ideals of the restaurant are fantastic, their food falls quite short.  If I wanted to drop a brick in my stomach, I would of headed down the road to the nearest McDonalds.  Some how this place manages to make the food look to enticing to people then completely fail when it comes down to actually being healthy and tasteful. "All aboard the fail boat", PF Changs is sinking quickly.
I've been going to this particular P.F. Chang's for years, and I enjoy its atmosphere-- unless it's the weekend or there's a special Stanford occasion like orientation or graduation, in which case I avoid it like the plague because it gets way too loud and service devolves into snail's-pace crap, which is totally not worth the overpriced food. I've gotten almost all of their vegetarian main courses a couple of times, but I eventually learned that all I need from this place is one appetizer-- their deliciously crunchy vegetarian lettuce wraps. It took me a long time to figure out how to fold 'em (and I still make a huge mess when I bite into one), but now I just order it as my meal and not as a starter. It's perfect if I'm with friends and don't have to act prim and proper. The mixed drinks, alcoholic or not, are tasty and well-made if you can handle the price; their wine selection is pretty good too. The desserts are brilliant-- I've had almost every one, and they're all quite decadent, although only a little bit better taste-wise than the Cheesecake Factory's selection of sweets. I love the shot glass samplers though-- they're cheap and just the right amount of over-the-top sweetness to end your meal.
Good food usually, but not great, and sometimes, just plain rude food. I guess the concept sounded good for the restaurant, Chinese theme, great new decorations, "happening" music and I'm too cool for my clothes young staff. Great formula, poor execution. And before I talk about this specific PF Chang's, what does the PF stand for? I will let your minds wander around that one... I got the Almond Chicken this time, with white steamed rice. I know, bland squared, but I had been having gut problems and didn't need to spice up the mix internally. But people, I would like SOME flavor for my meal. And no spices means no subtlety, just flatlined food. So this visit was a bust. Other times I got some great kung pao shrimp, good broccoli beef, too. Maybe I ordered the wrong thing. For a chain this well known, there should be no wrong things to order.
My first time at this location and was pretty impressed. We made reservations and our table was all set up for everyone, definitely the way to go. Our waiter was not all that friendly. If you've never tried PFs, you should; pretty much everything on their menu is tasty. You really can't go wrong.
We went here during their happy hour. The prices were good, nice portions, and great vegetarian options. We have the vegetable lettuce wrap which is really good. The edamame dumplings and vegetable dumplings were also very good. They didn't give more than 25 cent discount for the warrior card (which is free) because it was happy hour (otherwise, they give 10% off). Good service. All this & a coke was only $16+ tip, & filling!
Uhg. Poor service - never came back to see how food was, no drink refills. One dish (garlic eggplant) was inedible  - it tastes like styrofoam. Some portions large, some very small. Some dishes had half the dish with sauce and half the dish with no sauce. Noisy. Lots of staff at all times  - but they still take forever to seat people and then it takes forever to order, get food.
I've always loved PF Changs for Americanized asian food. Perfect for a picky husband who never grew up on asian cuisine. But the reason I'm here yelping is because I'm SO excited about their dessert menu. My husband and I always get the chicken lettuce wraps, crispy honey chicken, chicken chow mein and chicken fried rice and are MORE than satisfied, but I never have room for a full blown dessert, but always want a small bite of sweetness that a fortune cookie never really satisfies. When we went in today just for apps and drinks our server comes to us with a display of small sweet treats. They had everything from apple pies to tiramisu, and it was a perfect portion. Maybe 4 small bites, enough so you can have something sweet even when you're full and inexpensive enough so I could eat more than one if I really wanted to and try different desserts. The mai tais are excellent too, my husband will take me to PF Changs for a drink when i'm in a bad mood and everything will be better.
Too much hype for this place. Food is comparable to what you get to any  "quick lunch in the neighborhood's chinese restaurant" and it's pricy for what you get. Are they charging for the decor? because the service is well average as well. Loooong wait too. Would compare it to an asian "Friday's " version. But Friday's food is better.
Fabulous service, nice location, and great food. I had lunch here today, and we ordered Chicken Lettuce Wrap and Sesame Chicken. Both were excellent. I especially recommend Chicken Lettuce Wrap. It's an amazing food... and healthy! The server was very helpful and kind. This was my first time to P.F. Chang and I was content. :)
Time to give up on this location... Let me just straight to the point, avoid this particular PF Chang's, the service is absolutely awful. Inattentive staff. On the first occasion my wife and I went there we had a long wait time for a table, even though one could clearly see tables empty. The food was as one would expect from a chain, ok to eat and met our needs, but the waiter was terrible, he screwed up the orders - eventually brought us our drinks - failed to give any refills and it was a struggle to fin him again so that we could get out bill and pay. On the 2nd occasion which was today, my wife and I were seated by a lady who clearly had no motivation or inclination to be working or involved in the service industry. My wife and I waited for 15 solid minutes at our table after readings our menus and not one waiter looked at our table or came to us for service...In disgust we both walked out of the place. The thing is it is a very nice location, nice decor, food is ok there, but the staff !!! Obviously management here have no control on what is happening, there are plenty of waiters there, but they are not serving the customers. I've had better service experiences at the PF Chang's in Sunnyvale and in Blossom Hill...In another similar type restaurant of the Cheesecake factory I have never ever had a bad service experience. I'm done with spending my hard earned money at the Stanford location...
There are two types of Chinese food.  Authentic and American.  As such there are two types of standards by which to judge "Chinese" food.  Because as good as authentic beef tendon noodle soup can be, nobody will disagree that the very-American walnut shrimp or pan fried noodles are tasty too. Now the Reason why PF chang's is the worst "Asian" restaurant in the bay area, is because it fails utterly at both standards. Restaurants like PF Chang's exists because of the ignorance of Americans.  They think they are getting something legitimately Asian, but instead are greeted by unacceptably-dry meats, over or under seasoned pan fried noodles, and a so-called special sauce that is composed of nothing more than diluted soy sauce and the painfully common Sriracha rooster sauce. This restaurant stays alive because Americans like the notion of exotic yet classy food.  Someday, they will realize that just like Cheesecake factory, a fancy building does not mean fancy food. To go to PF chang's is to eat like a fool and welcome first-second generation Chinese criticism.  Don't do it.
Hit and miss on the service. My wife and son loves their there lettuce wraps . Most of their meal have the same time type of sauces.
We had lunch here today, and it was a huge disappointment. We came because we had a coupon for lettuce wrapped chicken appetizers, and the appetizer was OK but nothing special for me  (but my wife thought it "tasted funny".) However, the hot and sour soup we had was just awful - thick, like it had too much cornstarch, and tasting more like soy sauce than any hot and sour soup I'd ever had. I sent mine back. And the final lunch plates - Buddha's Delight stir fried vegetables for me, sesame chicken for my wife - were just nothing. No real decent flavor from the ingredients, and some aggressive spicing to try to make up for it. Nothing delightful about it at all. In short, not at all what we expected, and a big disappointment.
The order: cashew chicken bowl, lemon chicken bowl, spring rolls and green tea. 1. Food The 'cashew chicken' lunch bowl. yuuuuukkk.... a) it was bathed in a watery sauce, i couldn't see a dry piece of rice... [this is not the way chinese food is served, i live in s.f... i know] b) sauce was too watered down and no flavor, like someone just poured some plain-ass kikoman. c) I had to ask the waiter for a side of rice, so i can eat this plate correctly. [i didn't want to complain, nice of me...] My friend ordered the 'lemon chicken' bowl. ehhh d) They were little 'balls' of fried lemon chicken, which were kind of tasty, but only sat on a bowl of rice. This for about $8.50? come on now??? ** PLUS) He noticed i didn't like my plate and asked if I wanted something different. ** PLUS) I ordered t the 'beef with broccoli'. That beef was pretty darn good, but broccolli was okay.... 2. Decor. Very nice fusion with modern Asian. 3. Service: Very professional - but our waiter a little like 'marine bootcamp', a loud voice to confirm each order.... a little weird i guess. BOTTOM LINE: Save your money and go to a real Chinese restaurant or  a very good rated 'Asian fusion' restaurant. I spent over $30 with tip.
The food can be a bit on the greasy side. Overall though, it is still good. I really like their happy hour. They have great prices on both appetizers and drinks.
Gosh its not *that* bad.  There are always gonna be those vocal people who will hate on anything having a heavily corporate image - including upmarket designer chain restaurants - potentially disregarding quality food in the process.  Well, this dumb white guy loves tasty food, so I give it four stars.
This was the restaurant of choice for my boyfriend's family when they flew in from like, Fargo. Of course it isn't authentic, but PF Chang's can't even do inauthentic Chinese food right. We ordered some sort of fried greasebomb chicken (Chang Spice Chicken) and it wasn't good despite the grease, and I love grease. The Curry Coconut Vegetables lacked any flavor at all. The food is just bad, with the exception of the Shanghai Street Dumplings, which, according to the menu, are 'from the streets of Shanghai.' Untrue, as I've never seen such dumplings sold on the street, but then again, the words 'China' and 'Bistro' are a poor, if not obviously incorrect, permutation. Nothing made up for the food. The atmosphere is upbeat, but strikingly unstylish. For good inauthentic Chinese food, I recommend Panda Express and Mr. Chau's.
Five stars, if you need a gluten free meal.  I'm severely gluten intolerant and I think they are pretty careful with the gluten free meals.  Three stars, if you just want really good Chinese food. My big complaint is allowing dogs on the outside patio.  Yesterday the golden retriever puppy next to our table stank to high heaven, was ill trained, sniffed up my skirts in a disgusting manner, and was nerve wracking throughout the meal.  REALLY, NO DOGS SHOULD BE ALLOWED ON THE OUTDOOR PATIO!!!
Overall, a good tasty experience.  Sure it's not straight up authentic Chinese food - but think Chinese-American food with a twist!  We had the lettuce wraps (solid), honey crispy chicken (excellent), spicy green beans (not crispy enough!!), and singapore rice noodles (too wet, no familiar curry taste).  Our server was very pleasant - I think the location in downtown San Jose is better!  And no problems walking in and getting a table around 5:30 p.m. on a Thursday night.
Oh my, I'm addicted to their brown rice. Please tell me how to make it, please!!!!
I admit I went here and it's a chain and it's not really chinese. But, the service here is awesome.... Read more 
I am proud to be a Chang! OK, you might say it's not authentic, but the dishes are nonetheless BADASS! The atmosphere is really hip and the bar is always filled with people having a good time - this is the best one of all the locations. Mario, one of the managers there, is the greatest guy and he always makes sure our dining experience there is amazing. PF Changs is making its way to SF soon - YAY!
of course it's not authentic!  luckily, i don't ever come here craving authentic chinese food ;)  heck, i don't ever think of this place when i'm craving asian food in general :p HOWEVER, i do love their scrumptious lettuce wraps, sea bass and mongolian beef.  the la jolla location was perfect for our rehearsal dinner, semi-private room w/ food sufficient enough to please the die hard asian relatives as well as the non-asian guests' fear of cuisine that is too "exotic".
Blah blah blah, not authentic, blah blah blah, stupid chain restaurants... whatever, I like them for having brown rice (though their white rice was always bad anyway) and some healthy dishes on the menu. When needing a solo lunch in Palo Alto I often opt for an order of lettuce wraps and an iced tea.
In short PFC is basically a Panda Express with a celebrity chef style dining environment and you don't eat with plastic forks and paper plates like in a shopping mall food court but worse food.. For me this place was all about visual flare, like something you might see in a casino in Las Vegas but to be honest it best suits people that are too afraid to eat in a real Asian restaurants... to me PFC could not deliver on Asian authenticity, over cooked, over priced & dry Mongolian beef that was boasted on their menu as a signature dish, I am sorry but I love Mongolian beef and I know this dish because I have been ordering it for over 30 years and it sucked for the $17.00 it cost so for that was a big disappointment, the steam rice that was served was old or possibly just over cooked, Orange peel chicken that fortunately was not over cooked but lacked the usual candied flare and zest even Panda in the shopping mall delivers was not festive as the decor in the dining room. Only noteworthy dish was eggplant though it was too sweet for us... All in all I would say that one star for decor and the second for the staff as they were very friendly and nice however I don't go to restaurants to make friends with the staff the food comes first...   This place is probably better suited for cocktails and eggrolls and other types of appetizers rather than serious dining for the discriminating Asian pallet..
This was my first time to this location and I was pleased with my experience.  I made a quick reservation about 40 minutes prior.  I was seated immediately upon checking in.  Our waiter was attentive and courteous along with a spunky personality. Wow...did I just put down "spunky'...well, it fits the description.  The Mongolian beef was good....which it has been at other locations as well.  The Spicy chicken was good as well, I wouldn't say outstanding....but good as expected for a PF Changs.  The layout was decent for dining, I didn't focus on the bar area this time because I was seated quickly...so I can't write on it this time.  Overall good lunch experience.
This is not Chinese food. Perhaps the owners wanted to convince people that what they are serving is Chinese cuisine, but the fact that several important items are missing from the menu and the fact that nearly everything tastes like it was coated with a large spoonful of sugar makes me gag. To say that the menu has been Americanized is an understatement. For someone who has had "the real thing" I cannot bring myself to ever eat here again or recommend it to anyone. Also, the items are priced well above their actual value, and one should not expect to leave without having spent nearly twenty dollars on one item and one drink alone. I would not wish this place upon anyone.
Ack. The expensive-looking exterior with the imposing horse sculpture out front might lure you in, but take Feng Shui note that the horse turns its ass on the restaurant--a clear sign of what awaits you inside. This is a charmless airplane hanger of a dining room.  The decor is as tacky and tasteless as the food. The service was as friendly as your garden-variety police interrogation.
This is the opposite of an authentic Chinese restaurant. But this is not the reason I dislike this restaurant because I do like a lot of Americanized Chinese dishes. The problem is the food is not tasty at all and I believe an average Chinese housewife can do better. And none of the servers I saw during that dinner looked like Asian. So what's the point of naming it ..Chang China .?
I place a phone order for takeout on Sat Jan 21.  The order taker was pleasant and helpful.  The order was ready on time and the cashier took the time to go through the order with us to see if it was complete.  All the food was perfect.
PF Changs has good Americanized Chinese food - the crispy honey chicken is a no brainer along with the ma po tofu.  As you go through the menu, a lot of the chicken dishes tend to taste very similar.  Make sure to check your take out order!  They have screwed up my order on numerous occasions.
Every time I eat at a PF Chang's, I feel like my organs are going to shrivel up and die. Their food is SO salty! And heavy heavy heavy. I feel like everything is drenched in salt and sauce or something. The service is spotty and disorganised as well. Nay!
The chicken lettuce wrap was pretty good.  I prefer an authentic chinese restaurant.  This place is overrated.
Since I am "The Nibbler"  PF Chang's dessert shots are grrrrreat!  Well I really like the tiramisu dessert shot.  It is a more Americanized version of Chinese food but its still good and it certain dishes seem to be more healthy (like the brown rice).  And another plus is that its open later than usual for Northern California.  The service is not that great but it all depends on who waits on you.
This place is sub-par for the reputation they have. Our waiter was really slow, and our food took for-ev-ver to come out.  Granted, it was a bit crowded - but a place like that should be used the crowd and be able to deal with it effectively. I have the ginger steamed salmon, which I liked a lot.  I also had the shanghai cucumbers which had been soaked in some weird sesame sauce - those were not the best.  The lettuce wraps are decent, but not phenomenal. Our table had several different dishes, and I felt all of them lacked FLAVOR.  Overall, a very forgettable experience.  Good, but not one for the books.
I came here just for a pick up order for co-workers, and the impression the staff here gave me is enough to review the place for this one experience. Every single staff member that passed by me greeted me with a smile and asked if I have been helped. The take-out guy was very friendly and went over the entire order with me. Very opposite from most of the service at the Stanford Shopping Center, aside from Betsey Johnson.
After a one year hiatus, I decided to visit again. Boy how things change, in summary I was disappointed. Upon entering there was a congregation of 4 waiters/cashiers in the front busy chatting. I stood there admiring the decor and finally made eye contact.  When I told her I made reservations she replied in a sophomoric and unprofessional manner. I ordered Lettuce wraps, Vegetarian Ma Po Tofu and Double Pan Fried noodle vegetarian. The first two items were edible the later was disgusting. The taste was killed due to excessive soy sauce and the tofu was squishy and not crispy like it is described in the menu. The lettuce wraps were on the boring side, so I decided to order a side of chili sauce. I quickly realized this was a mistake, this sauce tasted stale and I had to drown the taste by washing it down with water. The waiter at our table was actually pretty cool. He actually asked if things were OK when clearing the table as he was eyeing the barely nibbled Pan fried noodles. I politely told him how I felt and was a little disappointed that he did not remove the item I did not like from the bill. I observed that this place seems more suitable for large groups instead of couples, so if you are on a date you are better off  on University Ave.
Yelp was spot-on about PF Chang's. Everything about this place is neither good nor bad - hence 3 stars. Service was good - we never had a difficult time flagging our waiter. Food was decent - the most notable dish we had was a steamed seabass which was buttery and tender.  However, having eaten seabass more often these days I have concluded that seabass has to be the fish they serve in heaven.  It's pretty hard to mess up.  So the delicious seabass did not win PF Chang's the extra star. As long as you walk into the restaurant not expecting anything more than the level of food and service quality normally expected in a chain restaurant, you will not be disappointed.
i came here because my ex-manager was treating me to lunch.  i didn't really have a choice.  but since i've never been here before, i thought i'd give it a try.  stepping into the restaurant, it didn't look like a chinese restaurant.  it was dim and the settings are very american style.  our food was ok.  we got the kung pao shrimp and mongolian beef.  both dish was ok.  i know i can get it better chinese food and more authentic some place else.  but this is palo alto, not sure where you can get authentic chinese food. i didn't expect much from the very beginning but i really doubt i'd come back again.
I have several close relationships with the parents of some of my friends. To simplify it, its like an extended family. 364 days of the year, this is a great thing and everyone is happier for it. However, there is one day that it can get a little trying: Christmas. In particular, a person who shall not be named always gets me the most crappy gifts... I'm very thankful that they took the care to get me something. However, I hate PF Chang's. Why are you forcing me to go here? Grrr. In any case, not one to let $50 go wasted.... Unfortunately, I couldn't manage to get over there. Finally, I'm with my Mom shopping at Stanford Mall and she suggests we stop by and get some quick and dirty food at PF's. "My treat, Mom!" Hmmm, this might work out. The food kinda sucked. I mean, it didn't really taste all THAT bad. However, one thing that really bugs me when I have chinese is if the rice isn't any good. How can I eat this with your white confetti? Also, the soup had no flavor other than salt... which could be a good thing... but I'm already pre-disposed not to like you... and I'm leaning farther... To top it all off, my Mom completely ignored my request to let me pay. I should have realized this would happen but I was rather insistent and thought the gift certificate thing would validate me...but my Mom doesn't budge too easy like. Ne how, so after all this I am forced to come again. Anyway, this is more like an episode and not much of a review, so I'll conclude by saying that I've still got this gift certificate in my wallet after all that... and that I won't give PF's one-star because if I never pay there... I might like this place one day after all.
Nothing can go wrong with Lettuce Cups. Yum. Service might suck a bit...but oh well...
I have eaten here a few times and never really had a bad meal. The food is always been tasty and presented well. It might be just how this location is set up, but it makes you feel like you are eating in a cafeteria. For the price of the menu items, it should be  more upscale. The dining room is just one big room with a bunch of tables scattered around. The service is OK. but I would not give any high marks for it.  If you want better Chinese food, go elsewhere.
I don't care what anyone says...the food is good!  So what if it isn't authentic...you don't go here because it is authentic, you go here because they have pretty good cocktails, great atmosphere and tasty food!  If you want authentic chinese food, go somewhere else. I love the mongolian beef with asparagus, chang's chicken, chicken lettuce wraps, coconut curry veggies, salt & pepper prawns and sea bass.  The desserts are pretty good too!
Check your order!  Just did takeout for the first time this evening, as we kind of got burned out on our local wok in a box.  Got home to find that two of our four items were wrong.  And regardless  of whether it was what we ordered or not,  the dishes were really marginal.   Had it not been so late and we were all not starving, I would have driven it back for a do-over. As for  eating there, did it once about a year ago and haven't had a desire to return.  Doubt I'll do take out there agian either.    I just don't get it.  They have so much going for them and they seem to miss on all points.
Im not sure what all the fuss is about. Its still typical Chinese food. It did seem fresh and food was good but certain not worth the price for the portions you receive. I was kind of disappointed but service wasn't bad, we sat at the bar.
Well...I've seen P.F. Chang's in boston and I've seen it in CA. I just wondered but I never gave it a try, until one rainy night. I'm glad we went. Now I know. Knowing just adds to my snobbiness. What's the deal with the horse? Call me crazy but I just went to the website and read up about the horse. I still have a question mark. We ordered the "Chang's for Two". It sounds so grandiose. I was hoping for a "Cheung's for Two". Moving on...we ordered Hot and Sour Soup, Egg Drop Soup, Vegetarian Lettuce Wraps, Mongolian Beef, Cantonese Shrimp, Strawberry Cheesecake, and Tiramisu. Dessert is the size of a shot glass. I guess it's good for the girls that say "imma go on a diet"  ;). I wondered about the Chinese character next to Hot and Sour Soup. It must be on fire. So we ordered it. Soup was what you'd expect from a fast food joint. I can't judge it in detail because I haven't yet tasted a good hot and sour soup and egg drop for the matter. I'm sure one day. Also given the fact she took away our soups like they had to do the dishes. We literally took 2 sips each(with a spoon). Lettuce wraps are sort of ok. I expected more of a fresh crunch not sog. Mongolian beef is decent. Perhaps they could lay off the sauce and scallions? I've never seen that many scallions on one dish? Did I order scallions or beef? I felt like I was going to a bbq and someone else touched the meat. Desserts whatever...I save La Baguette for that. The last dish is Cantonese Shrimp. Lets be honest. Don't tell me a Cantonese person cooked that. For real. I've seen Cantonese shimp. I've tasted it. Something you should take notice is that Cantonese chefs are obsessed with corn starch. I barely saw any corn starch. That's the palest shrimp I seen. That dish is something you'd expect me to cook up and be proud of. Not something you'd expect to pay for. Sometimes I wonder how people give ratings. Doesn't the logo say yelp "Real Reviews"? My one star is to even out these three star four star ratings. A bit harsh but I'm here for a real review. When you think about a 3+ star rating do you actually know what the P.F means? Perhaps it's Please Forgive. My actual rating is a 2, but a 5 if my fortune cookie comes true.
Yucky,  if you like Salt this your place.  2 stars for the service because they can't help the food quality or lack of.  What happened?
ate here twice, ended up at stanford hospital with an iv drip twice. i don't know what it is, but i feel like i should expect a stomach virus everytime i eat here. i strongly suspect msg in the sauces (which sends me into bouts of vomiting and days of terrible headaches), but if it's not the msg, it' something else with the preparation. no one should feel as terrible and weak as i did after eating at pf chang's. for a restaurant in the stanford shopping location, i expect food a lot better than this. and what the hell is with the waiter slipping his phone number on a piece of paper under my plate? it adds more insult to the pain i endured shortly after my meal. don't go here. go to mountain view and eat real chinese food at half the price, plus you'll probably end up sleeping at night without a bucket tied to your face.
When I first went to one of these locations, I was disappointed on many levels. First off I was looking for some good chinese: this is not good chinese. I was confused at the weird sauce they made in front of me, but it was nice of them. The dining area was huge and loud: I could barely hear myself think, let alone the waiter speak to me. Overall not a great place to go.
Valentines dinner at PF Chang's in Palo Alto.  We decided on the normally reliable chain for our dinner out, as other more intimate local restaurants had seized the opportunity to ignore the "three date" rule and screw anyone who might be looking to get lucky on Valentine's Day by tripling normal menu pricing. Firstly, the people watching was PHENOMENAL.  Not that I am anything to write home about, but even I watch enough of "What Not To Wear" to know that if you are not Brett Michaels (ok, even if you are),  you should probably not wear a crumpled straw cowboy hat with  ginormous gold hoops even if you are a cougar loaded for some cub, or just a loaded cougar.  Double entendre intended. On to the food.  I love the lettuce wraps.  I know - I could make them at home in a few minutes, but I kind of like watching them make the sauce that I never use.  :)  The food is predictably decent at PF Chang's, notice I did not say authentic.  You expect that what you order is going to taste the same as the last time you ordered it, right?  We have our standbys that we enjoy, and are usually happy with those.  We love the deep fried green beans and the lettuce wraps as an appetizer, and can rarely finish both but order them anyway.  I like the Orange Peel Chicken, M Squared's daughter loves the Mongolian Beef, and he likes the Asian Marinated NY Strip.  We ordered our fav's and watched the floor show unfold from our booth.  Our waiter was attentive, helpful and friendly.  Our app's were served and we happily got started.  :)  As we talked and noshed, we noticed the wait staff as they walked past our table also talking... and noshing!  Not just once or twice, but throughout our entire meal.  It's a bit disconcerting to see the folks that are serving your food also eating while you are being served.  Not just a couple of servers either, we counted no less than five different employees chewing a mouth full of food.  Hmmm.  :-/ Our dinners came to our table and the steak came without a steak knife - not a huge deal... until it didn't come for what seemed like an eternity.  At this point the restaurant was not at all busy.  When the knife was finally delivered it was clear why it took so long.  Holy #@*&'N Smoke break Batman!!  *Cough*  *Cough*  Seriously - chew some gum, wash your hands, spray some Febreze, something!  It was overwhelming! The food is good, the service overall was decent, but eating and smoking while serving is never ok.  Honestly - it really DOES smell that bad when you inhale a cigarette in record time. Watching the waitstaff eat while they serve food made us wonder if each dish was short a bite or three before it left the kitchen that night.  Having worked in restaurants before - I'm sure that the reality of what was happening at PF Changs that evening was that the management was serving food to the staff in the back.  It should have stayed in the kitchen.  Definitely an off night at PF Chang's.
I had PF Chang's for lunch and it wasn't my first time. The food here is good, even though it definitely is not close to being a true Chinese restaurant. Spicy chicken and lo mein are tasty, but nothing spectacular. Check out other Chinese places for more authentic and better value Chinese food.
It's a chain.  It's over-priced Chinese food.  I sort of like the modern and perhaps almost tacky decor, but the food does leave a little to be desired.  There are a few good dishes if you go with someone who knows the menu, but most are somewhat tasteless.  It is a safe place, though.  While no one will love their food, most will find that they are able to eat it and enjoy it on some level... so long as they remember that everything tastes decent with enough soy sauce.
Great lettuce wraps and bangin firecracker scrimp cocktail...wow, gotta try them both they are off the hook!
The service was good, the place was dead and it still took 10 minutes to get seated.  The food was OK.  Never get the Jasmine Gimlet unless you want to drink someting that taste like soap.  We couldn't even eat the garlic noodles, they had a really funky smell and no the funky smell was not garlic.  I usually really like the garlic noodles.
I visited here the other day and really enjoyed it.
This has got to be the worse "Chinese" food ever! In fact, it's NOT Chinese food at all. Sure it gets a crowd, but I doubt the patrons are there because they want authentic Chinese food. I had the unfortunate opportunity to visit this place because of a party and seriously, I should've eaten before I went. The margarita was good -- not Chinese -- but good. The owner certainly found his niche but please don't call it Chinese!!
True, it's not authentic Chinese food and shouldn't be confused with such.  But for those who like Straight's, Left Bank or Amber India  -- that is to say clean and popular Americanized versions of international cuisine -- PF Chang is a good option.  It offers a hip, well-appointed interior and very tasty food.  In my case, there are plenty of days when I'm looking for adventurous eating... but others where I am just as happy to pass up the pig's feet for a nice chicken lettuce wrap.
Being Asian and all, I found the food here to be needlessly drowning in sodium-laced sauces. Then again, I knew not to come here on my own volition. Darn business meetings with partners who like quote unquote Asian food.
I love PF Changs.  The one down in LA is really good and I thought this one was good too, but it really depends on the server.  I like the Vegetarian lettuce cups and the Szechuan Shrimp, extra spicy.  This is one of very few chains that I think is worth their salt.
As much as I like PF Changs, this particular location gets only three stars from me. Reason being is that the last time I ate here, the waiter totally forgot to put in our order and after waiting about 45 minutes to an hour wait for our seats, we ended up waiting another hour for my food. I had ordered a simple veggie curry dish and after about 30 minutes the waiter came back and said it was going to be a few minutes and 10 minutes later came back explaining that the original order was messed up and that they're making it correct for me. (how can you make veggie curry incorrectly?) I would have been happier and appreciated the truth rather than making excuses but he chose to lie about it. All this time, my poor boyfriend who was famished didn't want to eat w/out me kept his food aside until my food arrived but we both ended up picking off his food. We almost walked up and left after watching people who were seated way after us were already finishing up their meal but we saw the grinning waiter arriving w/our food and we were hungry so we ended up staying. We shouldn't have left him a tip but ended up giving him a small tip. BTW, TIP means "To Insure Promptness" I hate that waiters/waitress expect a TIP for every single table even if their service sucked @$$.
I'm usually not a fan of "fake" Chinese food. And I refer to anything that is Americanized Chinese food as "fake." However, it was late and this place was open and had a nice gluten free option page. I have to say that the service was good and they were fast.
I want here for a going away lunch with my team. It was my last lunch with my team before the end of my internship. The place is fancy, and I mean really fancy. Everything looks nice and such. But, wow, it is ehh.. The food was alright. I tasted much better, and it was pretty expensive. There was about 10 of us, and lunch pretty much cost us about $700. But, thankfully, our company was picking up the tab for my hard work.
I no no like this place that much. I hate their noodles but I like the soup, its okay the density but I've taste better eslewhere. The plus is that I get a 10% disco from my bill when i frequent this place but I only go here for drinks and the dynamite shrimp along with the mahi mahi or Asian Salmon.
P.F.  = pretty fake (chinese food). Great atmosphere for a nice business lunch or group lunch, but don't expect any authentic chinese food.
Holy hidden-ness Batman! This place is HARD to find, tucked away in the corner of Stanford shopping center. It would be a stretch to say hidden treasure, but if you forget it's supposed to be chinese food it's pretty good! You can't go to PF Changs thinking you're going to get traditional Chinese food; you'll only be disappointed. It is however pretty good food, with an asian flair. I much prefer the sunnyvale location on every level from decor to friendliness of staff to food quality.
First off, I think that this place is in a good location and the atmosphere is alright too.  However, I just don't think their cuisine is up to par.  It wouldn't be my first place to have Chinese food, very western style chinese food.  The only thing here that I think is pretty good is their eggplant in spicy sauce and thats pretty much it.
I'll have to say the ambience and decor of PF Chang's is very chic and the presentation of the food in general is nice. But in general, I think PF Chang's is over-rated and doesn't do enough for their customers. The service was OK, but several of the plates, bowls and forks were dirty. It was crowded and due to the hardwood floors, the "chatter" was so loud it was hard to carry on a conversation. I was disappointed in their fried rice (which they used to be famous for) as it was a little hard and too salty. Although the chicken and eggplant was not labeled "spicy" it was way over the top for my taste. The noodles in the chow mein were tasty but the over all flavoring was salty and greasy. The saving grace was the "oriental salad" which had a clean, fresh taste (not your traditional Chinese Chicken Salad).      Try it again???
I don't really understand the obsession with this restaurant.  It is the Asian version of The Cheese Cake Factory.  Mechanized service, boring food, cliche atmosphere.  The only thing this place has going for it is consistency.  I would only go here if nothing else was open or available.
It fills a little unfair to give 3 stars after only one lunch, but I'm going to do it anyway. What I really liked was the large variety of options on the menu and the fresh feel to the food. The place is also very clean which is nice. We had hits and misses with our food. Some was great like the no frills chicken soup with all white meat chicken, the Chinese Chicken Salad, and the free hot sauce that comes with your food and for which I needed a refill. On the flip side, the shrimp dumplings seemed a little processed though were tasty, the vegetables we got were a little undercooked and my salmon was a tad overdone. I'll still go back, because you can't really judge any place with a menu this appealing on just one visit.
Decent Chinese food and decent price. One star off for being slow in serving food!
I've come to accept that this place is an Americanized Chinese Chain Restaurant.  Once you get pass that thought, the place is great to meet up with friends for drinks and a meal.  The atomsphere is lively and the food is very tasty.  I love the lettuce wraps and mongolian beef!
I have read a few reviews and I am always taken by the "meh" statement--It is not in the English vocabulary and to me it sounds so very vulgar--And when I read the reviews of PF Chang's and the word "meh" came up, I could not take the review seriously--So I went to PF Chang's Palo Alto and I just loved it--The shrimp dumplings ( steamed) with the sauce was just delightful--I also had the mongolian beef and tangerine peach tea--Everything was yummy--So MEH on all you MEHERS--Don't trust the people that use MEH--They are out to get the restauranteurs and the public--
I went here for lunch and I though that the food and the service were really great.  I am totally biased against chain restaurants, but this place proved me wrong.  It was excellent!
Sorry, but I actually like this place.  I know it's not "real" Chinese food, but I've eaten it over the years and it's pretty good.  I really like the honey shrimp (and the honey chicken is good too), Chang's spicy chicken, mongolian beef, garlic noodles, lettuce wraps, crap wontons, the salad with the chicken/lime/peanuts, etc.  Oh, and the hot fish is good and the lemon scallops.  See, I've eaten here too much!  Anyhow, I think this is a nice place to come for a family meal.  I like the fortune cookies here too- they kind of have a faint vanilla taste.
Over priced Americanized Chinese food.  Bleh.  The place is done up up well though if you're looking for ambiance and don't mind Americanized Chinese food.
This is where I'd go if I am craving some Americanized Chinese food.  I know I could get better Chinese food elsewhere, at perhaps 1/2 the price, but I like the atmosphere here, and in general, the food isn't too bad.  I like the lettuce cups to start off the meal.  I also like the spicy green beans here...they're almost as good as Betelnut's.
For once, a Chinese restaurant with a nice, CLEAN, MODERN atmosphere as well.  I'm Chinese, but sometimes eating at dirty, noisy chinese joints can get tiring.  Besides, this location at the Stanford Shopping center is convenient and a decently priced option.  Some of the dishes at PF Chang's are quite authentic. Of the dishes I've tried, I recommend: Brocoli beef Dan Dan Noodles Kung Pao Chicken Walnut Prawns (they add some balled melons which is not authentic but a nice touch) Lettuce wraps They have brown rice as a healthy option as well! They also have a new 'mini' dessert option ($2 each), which is great if you just want a little something sweet at the end of your meal.  They are basically mini cakes in a shot glass. I did NOT like: Mu Shu Chicken -  the tortilla is a typical Mexican tortilla, which gets dry really quickly
P.F. Chang's is one of my favorite chain restaurants.  I love their lettuce wraps--they are delicious!
You're paying for ambience here, so prices are a little on the high side. Food is acceptable for an Americanized Chinese food experience. I like that the website posts nutritional information. It's surprising how some dishes have problem nutritional areas more than you'd expect. It was very crowded during lunch rush. I'd recommend adjusting your time accordingly.
Ate here years ago and food and service was good. Like most pf changs it seems quality has gone down and the size of portions while the prices have gone up.
I'm a fan. Went here recently on a date and often go with friends for dinner and drinks - good spot - can be a bit noisy but fun atmosphere and yummy food.
Somehow this never got posted. I'm trying again ... Very disappointing first impression of this highly recommended restaurant. My review is all service related and could have EASILY been a better review. But ... first 'poor' impressions set the tone and thus, in the end, even good food becomes second fiddle to service. First Fiasco (Act 1) We arrived without reservations and were quickly seated smack in front of the open kitchen (Sun 10/10/10 around 7:00pm). Way too loud with platters, dishes and assorted kitchen equipment being banged around AND of course the plentiful (loud) conversations between servers and cooks (unavoidable - not their fault). We asked to be moved. The hostess acknowledged our request, as we pointed to an empty dirty booth across the room as our desired seating location. Than we waited for the table to be cleared. A few minutes is one thing. Several minutes waiting and looking at an empty booth is troublesome. Waiting for a 12 minutes without any effort being made to ready the table for waiting customers, is incredible! Finally we approached the hostess with a "Can you please have someone clean the table for us?" (very calm, very courteous). After checking with the waiter (in charge of that section) she passes our group of four and said: "The waiter says that your table will be ready when he gets to it". WOW ... Finally after a total of 21 minutes waiting ... we were seated. (THE) Waiter apologized in passing with a non sincere, on auto-pilot "sorry for the long wait" in the same sentence that he welcomed us to his section. Second Fiasco (Act 2) He took our order for drinks. I had ordered 1/2 liter of Pellegrino Water; he comes back and tells me that they're out of those, but that I can have the full liter bottle. Pardon me but ... if he first suggested a 1/2 bottle, and knew that we waited a long time for our table ... wouldn't you think that PF Chang could get the 1/1 Bottle as a replacement for the 1/2 Bottle. Small things, but indicative of a mediocre customer service level at PF Chang's. Final Act Bottom line, if you want fabulous service, coupled with outstanding food it's Ming's Chinese Restaurant in Palo Alto on the Embarcadero (go there sooner rather than later as they're planning a Hotel Complex on the site) on the other hand if you're looking for an expensive, OK, 'nothing to write home about' experience, PF Chang is probably your place. If your expectation is meritocracy and the reality is at about that level (as we've experienced) you will not be disappointed. If you expect anything more than meritocracy, look elsewhere.
Very disappointed! The food was sub-par and completely overpriced. The decor was rather interesting and a bit over the top. In the end, the only positive about this place was the friendly staff. The food wasn't worth half of the bill.
I still enjoy the food, but the service has been extremely lacking lately!
I avoid all chain restaurants, but P.F. Chang's is one I tolerate and actually like.  The food is... Read more 
I love the food here and their waiters are always so nice! I have many favorites like the walnut shrimp, lettuce wraps, calamari, fried rice, MONGOLIAN BEEF, and honey chicken. I think I pretty much loved everything I had here :)
ok let me clear this up with you. i am chinese. I do not automatically hate americanzed chinese food. I have a spot for it in my stomach. I love orange chicken. but this place was pretty gross. The waiter was really nice and all. Chicken Lettuce Wraps were alright. I had the mongolian beef which was ok and orange chicken was kind of gross. It was all pretty gross. Dessert was pretty cool. But yea it was pretty gross.
The service was great. Friendly, prompt, and they kept my drink filled. They also gladly comped the horrible entree I was served. But we'll get to that... I haven't been here in years, kept away by vague memories of substandard food. Unwisely I chose to return today. It's obvious these guys have tons of money; the restaurant itself looks remodeled, while the staff is clearly happy. The honeymoon ends at first bite. Had the seared tuna and the crab wontons as apps. My first warning sign should have been when they took pains to emphasize on the menu that their tuna was "sushi grade". Maybe it was before it spent weeks in the freezer, that is. The wontons tasted like they'd come out of an assembly line in China, and the dipping sauce they gave had a disgusting moldy taste to it. The worst was yet to come, however. I'm talking about the Singapore noodles. Now, I'm a sucker for Singapore noodles. The late, lamented Spice Islands in Mountain View did a bang up job, and Shiok in Menlo Park still does. Well, this was a nightmare. The sickly-yellow noodles had a bizarre spongy, springy texture in the mouth. (Think microwave-grade ramen months past its expiration date.) The seasoning was some nightmarish mustard concoction, and mixed throughout the dish were chopped pieces of lettuce, as opposed to anything resembling an Asian vegetable. There is no excuse to ever go here, given the competition...
Nothing if not predictable. Healthier than alot of chinese food out there, but I wish they had more savory options and more spicy options. The sauce mixing is obnoxious. And come on you snobs, get off your high horses. No Chinese food here is "authentic", it's white-people-fied for the white-people market, whether the person running the register is of Chinese origin or not.
Good food, good service but something is lacking. Maybe it's because this is a chain maybe it's something else but I can't see myself give them more than 3 stars.
Boy, this place has gone downhill.  While the lettuce wraps were decent, the rest of the meal was not only forgettable, but just not very good at all.  It's even more of a shame because my girlfriend talked us all into going there just to be very disappointed.  The timing of the meal was totally off, which caused our mains to be cold.  They actually reheated the beef rather than remake it which left it overcooked, chewy, and barely edible.  The green beans we cold and mushy and lifeless. Yikes.
I have never had a bad meal here. The food is always really good. Mongolian beef is my favorite. Full stocked bar. Try the key lime martini...yum!
all of PF Chang's chain resurants -  food totally sux cuz it doesn't have the authenticity of the chinese food  atmosphere, its bland, and over-priced - its more for cacausions! bleh! - my friends who works there tell us not to eat it
The food is good as usual.  However, if you are planning on eating lunch here, plan on being at the establishment for at least 2 hours.  I have yet to have a trip to where I go in, enjoy my meal and leave and make it back to work on time.  I always have to get my order to-go after about a 45 minute wait.   It is best if you order take-out/to-go if you go during the work week.
So, the only reason that I'm not giving P.F. Chang's a 5 stars is that it's not really authentic. But, it is delicious.  I've eaten at this particular restaurant twice now, and I haven't been disappointed.  The service is good, the food tasty, and the prices are pretty reasonable. I will be back......but, when I am looking for "real" Chinese food, I'm heading to San Francisco....
Food was mediocre at best. What's worse was the attitude of the waiter. We won't be going back, ever.
I tried to see past the surly bartender who acted as if I was bothering him to eat at the bar. I have enjoyed several different PF Changs locations for years. I tend to stick to my favorite dishes and last night the Vegetable Lettuce Wraps were horrible. Greasy, Rice Noodles undercooked, tofu overcooked. Somebody in the kitchen is not managing to Mr. Puck's standards
Well, we went for Valentine's w/ my fiance.  He told me pick the place and I chose here versus Lobster Shack in RWC thinking we would "save" some money on Valentine's.  These are a couple of places I know won't jack up the prices for a meal on Valentine's SAT nite at that.  They were pretty booked so I had to foresight to call them ahead a day to inquire about an ad I saw in the PA daily.  The ad was for for their Prix Fixe menu.  I asked what the choices consisted of and found it was pretty diverse.  Booked a reservation for 515p for us.  (They had only after 830p or before 5p left, I knew they were going to be busy.)  Got there on Sat. night seated in about 10 min. we were a bit early. Then the food....... We got a great waitress, very attentive and pleasant.  We ordered the "Chang's for Two". It sounds so like a good deal for 2 for 39.95. We had drinks to start fiance had Heineken and I couldn't decide which bottle of wine to get so I asked for a sample of 2.  I then decided after trying and they came out w/ it quick. For food we started with Hot and Sour Soup, & Egg Drop Soup, (I liked the egg drop soup, never been a fan of hot n sour) Chicken Lettuce Wraps (were tasty but could have been more flavorful and temperature wise hotter), Crab won ton's, ( So good we had to have another).  They mistakenly had an extra order of crispy green beans so we got to try them for free. (Ok but only if fresh and needed to cook longer) Garlic noodles, (Tasty, but didn't like big pieces of cilantro). He got Honey shrimp ( I tasted it, was pretty delicious), I got Kung-Pao chicken (tasty but way to many peanuts, missed veggies like water chestnuts, and zucchini in it). By the time for desert we had some food to take home and no room for dessert.  We got the Red Velvet cake and I got Lemon Drop thingy. Dessert is the size of a shot glass, & we got it to go glasses and all.  That was a nice touch.  All in all, made for a pleasant outing for Valentine's day, but we spent entirely to much almost $150.  I ordered another bottle of wine too.  Neither of us was driving... I will go again and try to stick w/ the Chang's for two and crab won tons are a must have....
had lunch platters of beef and salmon and banana roll dessert food was great. prices were high. very well decorated. despite coming around 3 pm, service started slow worthwhile to splurge at once in a while
My wife and I love to go to PF Chang's for the Kung Pao shrimp, beef and broccoli and banana spring rolls. It is a little expensive, but worth it!
I have eaten at this location numerous times and at some other locations as well.  They are pretty much the same.  The quality of their food scores four stars.  They use premium ingredients, no doubt about that. Unfortunately, (You knew that was coming.) the preparation of the food and the portion control are unbelievably inconsistent.  An entree is not cheap, a single entree is normally $12-$14, and that includes a side of steamed brown or white rice.  Drinks, even tea, are extra.  I'm surprised they don't charge for tap water. When their food is well prepared, it is normally very good, exceptional, but that is only the case part of the time.  To make matters worse, for the price, you may get a portion the size of a Panda Express entree or your full money's worth. All in all, though I like some of their dishes when well-prepared, I've pretty well sworn off of PF Chang's.
The bar at this place is one of my favorite places to hang-out and meet friends. The food is great especially their version of the General's Chicken and their flatbread appetizers. I also like their new small desserts (much better than the huge pieces they used to serve). They have a great selection of wines, and a full bar. My friends and I always enjoy gathering here for happy hour, and the place seems alive with lots of people and families enjoying themselves.
Things that are wrong with this place: 1. Horrible and rude hostess 2. Dirty floor (i.e. leaves from the outside, scraps of paper, used napkins) 3. Unprofessional staff horsing around Recommendation Replace or train hostess with better customer service. If you like Americanized chinese food then this is the place to be.
I would say this deserves 3.5 stars, not the just 3, but I can't really give it 3.5 here. As much as it is Americanized Chinese food. I can't say I dislike it, I know it is a chain, so I wasn't expecting any different. The food tastes pretty good, and the service is very attentive. I like the taste of the lettuce wraps. The beef with broccoli was pretty good, the place is not crazy expensive either. It is a good place to go for a casual restaurant, not great, but good.
This place is hopping even on a weeknight.  Good food, nice servers, and a lot of fun.  The broccoli beef dish was good fusion food but the fun is in just working through several different appetizers.
P.F. Chang's has officially bottomed out.  We were there on a Saturday night with a reservation for 6.  The table and chair were pretty sticky when we arrived,  ,  bland, tasteless, overpriced dishes.  The noodles were SO bland, ugh.  The Mongolian Beef was chewy, not good quality meat, the yellow curry dish was unedible.   Waiter "waited" 15-20 to come back and check on us after dropping off the food, , never cleared any plates, asked if we wanted dessert during the meal, place has a COLD feel to it now.
You know what yelpers? I'm going to give this place 5 stars and help to make up for the negative reviews. You are all full of shit when you say that this is not an authentic Chinese restaurant. Hello, they are not trying to be an authentic Chinese restaurant! SO go to some hole in the wall Chinese restaurant, and don't come here and then complain. So anyways, we went to Stanford shopping center and then came here for an early dinner. We set outside because we had the baby with us and we wanted to enjoy the nice weather. The service was wonderful! I don't remember where and when the service was so good. I did not like all the the dishes that we ordered, but I was crazy about the walnut prawns with the melons, they were delicious. The green beens and their chicken( i forgot the name) were also very good, as well as the soup.  I didn't really care for the lamb or the snow peas however. But I will definately be coming back here just for those walnut prawns!
I hate Americanized Chinese food. There, I said it.
Every once in awhile I fear that I am being too snobby by turning my nose up at chain restaurants, so I try another one and wind up reminding myself again and again of why I don't do chains. We showed up at PF Chang's around 8:30 pm. and took a large booth in the corner. It took them 25 minutes to bring us water, and that's only after we asked for it. It's not like they had other customers to worry about - out of 35-40 tables in the place, only about 6 of them were occupied. I ordered vegetarian mu shu, our waiter let us know they only have chicken or pork. Since common sense didn't seem to work with our server, I had to explicitly ask him to leave the meat out of it, which seemed like a reasonable request. What they then decided to do was leave out all the other ingredients too, including the egg and cabbage. They brought me a plate of sauteed shredded lettuce thick with oil. They did redo the dish after I sent it back, but who fries lettuce and then charges $12 for it? Nasty. The server would walk by and see that we were done with our plates and didn't pick them up. We waited forever for the food, bill, etc. The only redeeming parts of the dinner were the egg drop soup and the nectarine tea, both of which were tasty.
me and my boyfriend LOVE Pf Chang's. The food is always great and the servers are fast. I love the way its set up, the dim lighting is relaxing and its a good location close to the mall. The only thing I would have to say is that when we walk in the door the people at the front desk aren't too friendly, they do take a while to greet sometimes. There have been times I have to stand there and interrupt their conversation to check in our reservation. Otherwise we really love this place. The chicken lettuce wraps, crispy honey shrimp, and the kung pao chicken are great.
I have mixed feelings about this place. Especially this location. I've been to various ones, but I think the food here is the worst. Normally, its not that bad, but its not necessarily good. Usually the reason I dine  here is when my team is having  a "dinner meeting". What's been consistently tasty is their kung pao prawns, and green beans. That's about it. They did something to their ma po tofu that made it weird. Also, I ordered take out from them last night, cause it was the only thing still open as I was driving home. I got the usual, veggie tofu lettuce wraps & garlic noodles. Something has gone awry here as well. The garlic noodles, had like NO GARLIC in it, scant amounts of red pepper flakes, hence NO FLAVOR. Just grease & noodles. Kinda sucked. The wraps had hardly any tofu. It was virtually all water chestnuts, and some other crunchy clear alleged vegetable that I could not identify. The brown rice was also too mushy.  I've ordered these dishes several times at several locations, so I know what its supposed to taste like. It was disappointing. I do however want to acknowledge the friendly staff. They always make you feel welcome, even as you're heading out the door.
americanized chinese food
They served us half cooked rice.  Thats pretty much all that needs to be said.
My husband and I had a dinner here Tuesday night around 7:30.  Not busy at all. Very poor service.  First of, nobody is available at the front to sit you.  We waited and looked around for a minute.  A waitress saw us just standing and so advised us to sit anywhere we want.  So we did.  We just sat.....and sat.... no drinks, no water, no menu. We looked uncomfortably around wondering if anyone is aware that we are diners.  Finally a waiter showed up and asked us who sit us in the table.  Well, you see the picture I am pointing out. Anyways, the service people are just confuse and not trained properly.  Food is so-so.  Food came pretty fast.  I do not like their fried wontons.  Who could possibly mess up a good frying in a place claiming its bistro? The 3 sauces that servers bring to your table is ridiculous.  It drops like an eyedrop bottle.  They got to toss that useless sauce dispenser.  So cheap and it does not match their theme (BISTRO). Their calamari tasted fish balls, texture wise.   Chicken in black beans sauce were too salty. Fried rice were ok anyone could make at home.  Only positive I could say is that their ambiance is nice. Nothing really special aside from the interior.  We will not dine here again.  If I get invited maybe...but I will bring a packed PB&J sandwich to snack on.
How the mighty have fallen! I remember a time when a long wait was the norm at this place. Below average food, (We ordered a few items and shared). Curry was bland. Rice was bad. And the hot and sour soup was a cold cup-o-goo. The staff was very friendly and the decor nice, but we went for the food. We will not return.
I always dine in the bar and they are always on there game! The hapy hour is great, even the late night one. I know what I like and the food is always what I expect.
this place is as Chinese as a fish taco. which doesn't mean that they do not have decent food. just keep it real and call it "Chinese-inspired." Latinos in the kitchen and gwailo (Canto-slang for Anglo)  serving it to you. seriously i have never seen a countryman work here. but the chicken lettuce cups are decent and so are the kung pao prawns. rumor has it that Mr. PF Chang really IS Chinese and laughing all the way to the bank. another quite strange rumor i heard is that the next Bay Area opening will be in SAN FRANCISCO! not sure how that will be accepted by the locals. My take is: it will be like the recent attempt by STARBUCKS to open in North Beach. NOT!
food is definitely tasty and innovative. for really good chinese, try mandarin gourmet in cupertino. if you are in the mood for a weak attempt at asian-fusion and dont mind the restaurant-chain feel that invariably takes over the menu, then continue eating at PF changs by all means. this location is SUPER busy on the weekends so definitely make reservations unless you want to wander around stanford shopping center for almost an hour.
Slow service and the egg flower soup tastes like chicken noodle but good if you want to eat chinese food in a slow eating environment.
For a chain Chinese-food place, this PF Chang's isn't bad.  The trick is to make reservations in advance because they are always busy.  The food is always good and hot (although admittedly probably not that good for you with all the sodium), and the beer is always cold.  The servers, etc. are always very friendly.  The only downside is that the restaurant does have a bit of a chain atmosphere, which is because .... it is a chain.
Cool interior, good waiter service, lots of crowd
I received beyond excellent service at this restaurant. After being brought a dish that wasn't made correctly, the waiter took it back immediately, made a new dish, and didn't charge us for either. Everything was handled so quickly. I have been meaning to write this review for months and have long since forgotten the waiter's name, but it proves that the waiter can make or break the meal.
It may be "yuppified" chinese, but it still tastes really good.  I especially liked the walnut shrimp and salt & pepper prawns.  Lettuce wraps and fried green beans were also excellent starters!  Great energy for a lively crowd (not so good for a "quiet dinner).  I recommend it as part of a fun night out.
sometimes the food is perfect, another you can not eat it. not my favorite restaurant, but "ok"
Everything I have to say has already been said regarding the food. Pretty bland and not really that great tasting.  My waiter was this college girl, and after she found out my bday was just around the corner, she hooked it up with a nice ice cream dish for free. That earned a star, because I didn't expect it at all.
I knew my former boss was doing drugs when she once told me that the worst Chinese food is in Hong Kong. WTF?!! Then I realize that there's a lot of Chinese restaurants in San Francisco that caters to Western taste. When there is a proliferation of pseudo ethnic eateries in a culture dominated by an army of consumers with a propensity to consume what smells and tastes familiar, then the rational for the existence of these establishments becomes clearer. One such restaurant is PF Chang's. Everytime we dine here, the asians are outnumbered 40 to 1.  Needless to say, chinese food here is as authentic as those Prada bags you bid on eBay. Well, ok not all of them but you get the point. I guess you can say that we dine here because my daughter eats nothing but hotdogs, burgers and fries and to deviate from that norm would be unthinkable. To PF Chang's credit, the food we've had here is always fresh and clean tasting. Food here does not taste like they were all cooked from the same wok. Not to mention that they always have clean restrooms.
Pretty good happy hour between 3:30 and 6:00 everyday.  Their HH lettuce wraps are delicious; and so is their calamari.  Their crab wontons are very good, and not too greasy.  They mix the sauce right in front of you, so you can name how hot/spicy/mild you like it.
The gluten free menu and how seriously PF Chang's takes it, truly sets them apart from other restaurants.  I love being able to choose from a large selection of gluten free products and know that is will taste good!  PF Chang's has become a staple in my restaurant rotation.
worst PF Changs I have been to. High Ceilings and open tables make for louder than average dining. Food not as good as their place in Emeryville and Fremont. Service was so so. Management need to instruct employees to clean and sanitize all surfaces. Do  yourself a favor and spend your dollars at the Nordstrom Cafe in the Stanford shopping center or other restaurant nearby ( Max's?) etc or go down to University avenue downtown and eat at an "unchained" restaurant.
if you are smart you get a cocktail in the bar order something simple,eat at the bar ,enjoy good conversation and then get the hell out
i often dine alone at the bar and thouroughly enjoy the seared ahi,however,i think the male... Read more 
